Mississippi, session 2026, HB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) When executing any warrant in or at a residence, home, apartment, room, building or premises or any other dwelling place under the laws of this state, the executing officer shall, before entering the premises, give appropriate notice of the identity, authority and purpose of the officer to the person to be searched or arrested, or to the person in apparent control of the premises to be searched. (2)  The executing officer shall read and give a copy of the warrant to the person to be searched or arrested, or to the person in apparent control of the premises to be searched. If the premises are unoccupied or there is no one in apparent control, the officer shall leave a copy of the warrant suitably affixed to the premises. (3)  All warrants shall only be executed within the period and at the times authorized by the warrant and only by a police officer.  A police officer charged with its execution may be accompanied by such other persons as may be reasonably necessary for the successful execution of the warrant with all practicable safety. SECTION 2.  Section 41-29-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-157.  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in Section * * *41‑29‑107.1 1 of this act, issuance and execution of administrative inspection warrants and search warrants shall be as follows, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section: (1)  A judge of any state court of record, or any justice court judge within his jurisdiction, and upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause, may issue warrants for the purpose of conducting administrative inspections authorized by this article or rules thereunder, and seizures of property appropriate to the inspections. For purposes of the issuance of administrative inspection warrants, probable cause exists upon showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this article or rules thereunder, sufficient to justify administrative inspection of the area, premises, building or conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the warrant.  All such warrants shall be served during normal business hours; (2)  A search warrant shall issue only upon an affidavit of a person having knowledge or information of the facts alleged, sworn to before the judge or justice court judge and establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant.  If the judge or justice court judge is satisfied that grounds for the application exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, he shall issue a warrant identifying the area, premises, building or conveyance to be searched, the purpose of the search, and, if appropriate, the type of property to be searched, if any.  The warrant shall: (A)  State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support thereof; (B)  Be directed to a person authorized by Section 41-29-159 to execute it; (C)  Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premises, building or conveyance identified for the purpose specified, and if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified; (D)  Identify the item or types of property to be seized, if any; (E)  Direct that it be served and designate the judge or magistrate to whom it shall be returned; (3)  A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and returned within ten (10) days of its date unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise.  If property is seized pursuant to a warrant, a copy shall be given to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken, together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any property taken.  The inventory shall be made in the presence of the person executing the warrant and of the person from whose possession or premises the property was taken, if present, or in the presence of at least one (1) credible person other than the person executing the warrant.  A copy of the inventory shall be delivered to the person from whom or from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the warrant; (4)  The judge * * * or justice court judge who has issued a warrant shall attach thereto a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection therewith and file them with the clerk of the appropriate state court for the judicial district in which the inspection was made. (b)  The Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, the State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Medical Licensure, the State Board of Dental Examiners, the Mississippi Board of Nursing or the State Board of Optometry may make administrative inspections of controlled premises in accordance with the following provisions: (1)  For purposes of this section only, "controlled premises" means: (A)  Places where persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this article are required to keep records; and (B)  Places including factories, warehouses, establishments and conveyances in which persons registered or exempted from registration requirements under this article are permitted to hold, manufacture, compound, process, sell, deliver, or otherwise dispose of any controlled substance. (2)  When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant issued in accordance with the conditions imposed in this section and Section 1 of this act, an officer or employee designated by the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, the State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Medical Licensure, the State Board of Dental Examiners, the Mississippi Board of Nursing or the State Board of Optometry, upon presenting the warrant and appropriate credentials to the owner, operator or agent in charge, may enter controlled premises for the purpose of conducting an administrative inspection. (3)  When authorized by an administrative inspection warrant, an officer or employee designated by the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, the State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Medical Licensure, the State Board of Dental Examiners, the Mississippi Board of Nursing or the State Board of Optometry may: (A)  Inspect and copy records required by this article to be kept; (B)  Inspect, within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, controlled premises and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished material, containers and labeling found therein, and, except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, all other things therein, including records, files, papers, processes, controls and facilities bearing on violation of this article; and (C)  Inventory any stock of any controlled substance therein and obtain samples thereof. (4)  This section does not prevent the inspection without a warrant of books and records pursuant to an administrative subpoena, nor does it prevent entries and administrative inspections, including seizures of property, without a warrant: (A)  If the owner, operator or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents; (B)  In situations presenting imminent danger to health or safety; (C)  In situations involving inspection of conveyances if there is reasonable cause to believe that the mobility of the conveyance makes it impracticable to obtain a warrant; (D)  In any other exceptional or emergency circumstance where time or opportunity to apply for a warrant is lacking; or (E)  In all other situations in which a warrant is not constitutionally required. (5)  An inspection authorized by this section shall not extend to financial data, sales data, other than shipment data, or pricing data unless the owner, operator or agent in charge of the controlled premises consents in writing. * * *(c)  Any agent of the bureau authorized to execute a search warrant involving controlled substances, the penalty for which is imprisonment for more than one (1) year, may, without notice of his authority and purpose, break open an outer door or inner door, or window of a building, or any part of the building, if the judge issuing the warrant: (1) Is satisfied that there is probable cause to believe that: (A) The property sought may, and, if such notice is given, will be easily and quickly destroyed or disposed of; or (B) The giving of such notice will immediately endanger the life or safety of the executing officer or another person; and (2) Has included in the warrant a direction that the officer executing the warrant shall not be required to give such notice. Any officer acting under such warrant shall, as soon as practical, after entering the premises, identify himself and give the reasons and authority for his entrance upon the premises. Search warrants which include the instruction that the executing officer shall not be required to give notice of authority and purpose as authorized by this subsection shall be issued only by the county court or county judge in vacation, chancery court or by the chancellor in vacation, by the circuit court or circuit judge in vacation, or by a justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court. This subsection shall expire and stand repealed from and after July 1, 1974, except that the repeal shall not affect the validity or legality of any search authorized under this subsection and conducted prior to July 1, 1974. SECTION 3.  Section 99-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-1.  (1)  Arrests for crimes and offenses may be made by the sheriff or his or her deputy or by any constable or conservator of the peace within his or her county, or by any marshal or policeman of a city, town or village within the same, or by any United States Marshal or Deputy United States Marshal, or, when in cooperation with local law enforcement officers, by any other federal law enforcement officer who is employed by the United States government, authorized to effect an arrest for a violation of the United States Code, and authorized to carry a firearm in the performance of his or her duties.  Private persons may also make arrests. (2)  (a)  Any person authorized by a court of law to supervise or monitor a convicted offender who is under an intensive supervision program may arrest the offender when the offender is in violation of the terms or conditions of the intensive supervision program, without having a warrant if: (i)  The arrest is authorized or ordered by a judge of the court; (ii)  The person making the arrest has been trained at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy established under Section 45-5-1 et seq. or at a course approved by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training; and (iii)  The judge identifies the person making the arrest in his or her order and a copy of the order is served upon the person being arrested. (b)  For the purposes of * * *the this subsection (2), the term "intensive supervision program" means an intensive supervision program of the Department of Corrections as described in Section 47-5-1001 et seq., of any similar program authorized by a court for offenders who are not under jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections. (3)  Any arrests made under the provisions of this section shall comply with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 4.  Section 99-3-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-7.  (1)  An officer or private person may arrest any person without warrant, for an indictable offense committed, or a breach of the peace threatened or attempted in his presence; or when a person has committed a felony, though not in his presence; or when a felony has been committed, and he has reasonable ground to suspect and believe the person proposed to be arrested to have committed it; or on a charge, made upon reasonable cause, of the commission of a felony by the party proposed to be arrested.  And in all cases of arrests without warrant, the person making such arrest must inform the accused of the object and cause of the arrest in compliance with Section 1 of this act, except when he is in the actual commission of the offense, or is arrested on pursuit. (2)  Any law enforcement officer may arrest any person on a misdemeanor charge without having a warrant in his possession when a warrant is in fact outstanding for that person's arrest and the officer has knowledge through official channels that the warrant is outstanding for that person's arrest.  In all such cases, the officer making the arrest must inform such person at the time of the arrest the object and cause therefor in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  If the person arrested so requests, the warrant shall be shown to him as soon as practicable. (3)  (a)  Any law enforcement officer shall arrest a person with or without a warrant when he has probable cause to believe that the person has, within twenty-four (24) hours of such arrest, knowingly committed a misdemeanor or felony that is an act of domestic violence or knowingly violated provisions of a criminal domestic violence or sexual assault protection order issued pursuant to Section 97-3-7(11), 97-3-65(6) or 97-3-101(5) or an ex parte protective order, protective order after hearing or court-approved consent agreement entered by a chancery, circuit, county, justice or municipal court pursuant to the Protection from Domestic Abuse Law, Sections 93-21-1 through 93-21-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, or a restraining order entered by a foreign court of competent jurisdiction to protect an applicant from domestic violence. (b)  If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that two (2) or more persons committed an act of domestic violence as defined herein, or if two (2) or more persons make complaints of domestic violence to the officer, the officer shall attempt to determine who was the principal aggressor.  The term principal aggressor is defined as the party who poses the most serious ongoing threat, or who is the most significant, rather than the first, aggressor.  The officer shall presume that arrest is not the appropriate response for the person or persons who were not the principal aggressor.  If the officer affirmatively finds more than one (1) principal aggressor was involved, the officer shall document those findings. (c)  To determine which party was the principal aggressor, the officer shall consider the following factors, although such consideration is not limited to these factors: (i)  Evidence from the persons involved in the domestic abuse; (ii)  The history of domestic abuse between the parties, the likelihood of future injury to each person, and the intent of the law to protect victims of domestic violence from continuing abuse; (iii)  Whether one (1) of the persons acted in self-defense; and (iv)  Evidence from witnesses of the domestic violence. (d)  A law enforcement officer shall not base the decision of whether to arrest on the consent or request of the victim. (e)  A law enforcement officer's determination regarding the existence of probable cause or the lack of probable cause shall not adversely affect the right of any party to independently seek appropriate remedies. (4)  (a)  Any person authorized by a court of law to supervise or monitor a convicted offender who is under an intensive supervision program may arrest the offender when the offender is in violation of the terms or conditions of the intensive supervision program, without having a warrant, provided that the person making the arrest has been trained at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy established under Section 45-5-1 et seq., or at a course approved by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training. (b)  For the purposes of this subsection, the term "intensive supervision program" means an intensive supervision program of the Department of Corrections as described in Section 47-5-1001 et seq., or any similar program authorized by a court for offenders who are not under jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections. (5)  As used in subsection (3) of this section, the phrase "misdemeanor or felony that is an act of domestic violence" shall mean one or more of the following acts between current or former spouses or a child of current or former spouses, persons living as spouses or who formerly lived as spouses or a child of persons living as spouses or who formerly lived as spouses, a parent, grandparent, child, grandchild or someone similarly situated to the defendant, persons who have a current or former dating relationship, or persons who have a biological or legally adopted child together: (a)  Simple or aggravated domestic violence within the meaning of Section 97-3-7; (b)  Disturbing the family or public peace within the meaning of Section 97-35-9, 97-35-11, 97-35-13 or 97-35-15; or (c)  Stalking within the meaning of Section 97-3-107. (6)  Any arrest made pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be designated as domestic assault or domestic violence on both the arrest docket and the incident report.  Any officer investigating a complaint of a misdemeanor or felony that is a crime of domestic violence who finds probable cause that such an offense has occurred within the past twenty-four (24) hours shall file an affidavit on behalf of the victim(s) of the crime, regardless of whether an arrest is made within that time period.  If the crime is reported or investigated outside of that twenty-four-hour period, the officer may file the affidavit on behalf of the victim.  In the event the officer does not file an affidavit on behalf of the victim, the officer shall instruct the victim of the procedure for filing on his or her own behalf. (7)  A law enforcement officer shall not be held liable in any civil action for an arrest based on probable cause and in good faith pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, or failure, in good faith, to make an arrest pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (8)  The authority for the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and deputy state fire marshals to make arrests shall be governed by the provisions of Section 45-11-1. SECTION 5.  Section 7-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-1-21.  Investigators and other personnel, employed by the Governor pursuant to Section 7-1-19, shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, or arrest any person, firm, corporation, or any combination or conspiracy thereof committing said acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidations, or acts of terror, or damaging, injuring, or destroying property as a result of acts of violence or terror, in any manner whatever, and to help indict or prosecute, or both, in all such cases.  Such investigators or other personnel so employed by the Governor, in the performance of their duties under Sections 7-1-19 through 7-1-23, are authorized and empowered to carry firearms and to serve warrants and subpoenas issued under the authority of the State of Mississippi in compliance with Section 1 of this act; to make arrests without warrant in such cases where the person making the arrest has reasonable grounds to believe that the person so arrested is guilty of any of the offenses herein named and there is a likelihood of the person escaping before a warrant can be obtained for his or her arrest, but the person arrested shall be immediately taken before a committing officer; to acquire, collect, classify, and preserve records and evidence obtained hereunder; and to make all lawful searches and seizures to obtain evidence of such acts, when based upon reasonable grounds or probable cause that such is necessary in the accomplishment of the purposes of the aforesaid sections. SECTION 6.  Section 7-5-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-5-67.  Persons employed by the Attorney General as investigators in the Public Integrity Division whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime, the apprehension of criminals and the enforcement of the criminal laws of this state shall be empowered to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 7.  Section 7-7-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-7-211.  The department shall have the power and it shall be its duty: (a)  To identify and define for all public offices of the state and its subdivisions generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as promulgated by nationally recognized professional organizations and to consult with the State Fiscal Officer in the prescription and implementation of accounting rules and regulations; (b)  To provide best practices, for all public offices of regional and local subdivisions of the state, systems of accounting, budgeting and reporting financial facts relating to said offices in conformity with legal requirements and with generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as promulgated by nationally recognized professional organizations; to assist such subdivisions in need of assistance in the installation of such systems; to revise such systems when deemed necessary, and to report to the Legislature at periodic times the extent to which each office is maintaining such systems, along with such recommendations to the Legislature for improvement as seem desirable; (c)  To study and analyze existing managerial policies, methods, procedures, duties and services of the various state departments and institutions upon written request of the Governor, the Legislature or any committee or other body empowered by the Legislature to make such request to determine whether and where operations can be eliminated, combined, simplified and improved; (d)  To postaudit each year and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate the financial affairs of the departments, institutions, boards, commissions, or other agencies of state government, as part of the publication of a comprehensive annual financial report for the State of Mississippi, or as deemed necessary by the State Auditor.  In complying with the requirements of this paragraph, the department shall have the authority to conduct all necessary audit procedures on an interim and year-end basis; (e)  To postaudit and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate separately the financial affairs of (i) the offices, boards and commissions of county governments and any departments and institutions thereof and therein; (ii) public school districts, departments of education and junior college districts; and (iii) any other local offices or agencies which share revenues derived from taxes or fees imposed by the State Legislature or receive grants from revenues collected by governmental divisions of the state; the cost of such audits, investigations or other services to be paid as follows:  Such part shall be paid by the state from appropriations made by the Legislature for the operation of the State Department of Audit as may exceed the sum of Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per man-hour for the services of each staff person engaged in performing the audit or other service plus the actual cost of any independent specialist firm contracted by the State Auditor to assist in the performance of the audit, which sum shall be paid by the county, district, department, institution or other agency audited out of its general fund or any other available funds from which such payment is not prohibited by law.  Costs paid for independent specialists or firms contracted by the State Auditor shall be paid by the audited entity through the State Auditor to the specialist or firm conducting the postaudit. Each school district in the state shall have its financial records audited annually, at the end of each fiscal year, either by the State Auditor or by a certified public accountant approved by the State Auditor.  Beginning with the audits of fiscal year 2010 activity, no certified public accountant shall be selected to perform the annual audit of a school district who has audited that district for three (3) or more consecutive years previously.  Certified public accountants shall be selected in a manner determined by the State Auditor.  The school district shall have the responsibility to pay for the audit, including the review by the State Auditor of audits performed by certified public accountants; (f)  To postaudit and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate the financial affairs of the levee boards; agencies created by the Legislature or by executive order of the Governor; profit or nonprofit business entities administering programs financed by funds flowing through the State Treasury or through any of the agencies of the state, or its subdivisions; and all other public bodies supported by funds derived in part or wholly from public funds, except municipalities which annually submit an audit prepared by a qualified certified public accountant using methods and procedures prescribed by the department; (g)  To make written demand, when necessary, for the recovery of any amounts representing public funds improperly withheld, misappropriated and/or otherwise illegally expended by an officer, employee or administrative body of any state, county or other public office, and/or for the recovery of the value of any public property disposed of in an unlawful manner by a public officer, employee or administrative body, such demands to be made (i) upon the person or persons liable for such amounts and upon the surety on official bond thereof, and/or (ii) upon any individual, partnership, corporation or association to whom the illegal expenditure was made or with whom the unlawful disposition of public property was made, if such individual, partnership, corporation or association knew or had reason to know through the exercising of reasonable diligence that the expenditure was illegal or the disposition unlawful.  Such demand shall be premised on competent evidence, which shall include at least one (1) of the following:  (i) sworn statements, (ii) written documentation, (iii) physical evidence, or (iv) reports and findings of government or other law enforcement agencies.  Other provisions notwithstanding, a demand letter issued pursuant to this paragraph shall remain confidential by the State Auditor until the individual against whom the demand letter is being filed has been served with a copy of such demand letter.  If, however, such individual cannot be notified within fifteen (15) days using reasonable means and due diligence, such notification shall be made to the individual's bonding company, if he or she is bonded.  Each such demand shall be paid into the proper treasury of the state, county or other public body through the office of the department in the amount demanded within thirty (30) days from the date thereof, together with interest thereon in the sum of one percent (1%) per month from the date such amount or amounts were improperly withheld, misappropriated and/or otherwise illegally expended.  In the event, however, such person or persons or such surety shall refuse, neglect or otherwise fail to pay the amount demanded and the interest due thereon within the allotted thirty (30) days, the State Auditor shall have the authority and it shall be his duty to institute suit, and the Attorney General shall prosecute the same in any court of the state to the end that there shall be recovered the total of such amounts from the person or persons and surety on official bond named therein; and the amounts so recovered shall be paid into the proper treasury of the state, county or other public body through the State Auditor.  In any case where written demand is issued to a surety on the official bond of such person or persons and the surety refuses, neglects or otherwise fails within one hundred twenty (120) days to either pay the amount demanded and the interest due thereon or to give the State Auditor a written response with specific reasons for nonpayment, then the surety shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of twelve percent (12%) of the bond, not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), to be deposited into the State General Fund; (h)  To investigate any alleged or suspected violation of the laws of the state by any officer or employee of the state, county or other public office in the purchase, sale or the use of any supplies, services, equipment or other property belonging thereto; and in such investigation to do any and all things necessary to procure evidence sufficient either to prove or disprove the existence of such alleged or suspected violations.  The Division of Investigation of the State Department of Audit may investigate, for the purpose of prosecution, any suspected criminal violation of the provisions of this chapter.  For the purpose of administration and enforcement of this chapter, the enforcement employees of the Division of Investigation of the State Department of Audit have the powers of a law enforcement officer of this state, and shall be empowered to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  All enforcement employees of the Division of Investigation of the State Department of Audit hired on or after July 1, 1993, shall be required to complete the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program and shall meet the standards of the program; (i)  To issue subpoenas, with the approval of, and returnable to, a judge of a chancery or circuit court, in termtime or in vacation, to examine the records, documents or other evidence of persons, firms, corporations or any other entities insofar as such records, documents or other evidence relate to dealings with any state, county or other public entity.  The circuit or chancery judge must serve the county in which the records, documents or other evidence is located; or where all or part of the transaction or transactions occurred which are the subject of the subpoena; (j)  In any instances in which the State Auditor is or shall be authorized or required to examine or audit, whether preaudit or postaudit, any books, ledgers, accounts or other records of the affairs of any public hospital owned or owned and operated by one or more political subdivisions or parts thereof or any combination thereof, or any school district, including activity funds thereof, it shall be sufficient compliance therewith, in the discretion of the State Auditor, that such examination or audit be made from the report of any audit or other examination certified by a certified public accountant and prepared by or under the supervision of such certified public accountant.  Such audits shall be made in accordance with generally accepted standards of auditing, with the use of an audit program prepared by the State Auditor, and final reports of such audits shall conform to the format prescribed by the State Auditor.  All files, working papers, notes, correspondence and all other data compiled during the course of the audit shall be  available, without cost, to the State Auditor for examination and abstracting during the normal business hours of any business day. The expense of such certified reports shall be borne by the respective hospital, or any available school district funds, subject to examination or audit.  The State Auditor shall not be bound by such certified reports and may, in his or their discretion, conduct such examination or audit from the books, ledgers, accounts or other records involved as may be appropriate and authorized by law; (k)  The State Auditor shall have the authority to contract with qualified public accounting firms to perform selected audits required in paragraphs (d), (e), (f) and (j) of this section, if funds are made available for such contracts by the Legislature, or if funds are available from the governmental entity covered by paragraphs (d), (e), (f) and (j). Such audits shall be made in accordance with generally accepted standards of auditing.  All files, working papers, notes, correspondence and all other data compiled during the course of the audit shall be available, without cost, to the State Auditor for examination and abstracting during the normal business hours of any business day; (l)  The State Auditor shall have the authority to establish training courses and programs for the personnel of the various state and local governmental entities under the jurisdiction of the Office of the State Auditor.  The training courses and programs shall include, but not be limited to, topics on internal control of funds, property and equipment control and inventory, governmental accounting and financial reporting, and internal auditing.  The State Auditor is authorized to charge a fee from the participants of these courses and programs, which fee shall be deposited into the Department of Audit Special Fund. State and local governmental entities are authorized to pay such fee and any travel expenses out of their general funds or any other available funds from which such payment is not prohibited by law; (m)  Upon written request by the Governor or any member of the State Legislature, the State Auditor may audit any state funds and/or state and federal funds received by any nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of this state; (n)  To conduct performance audits of personal or professional service contracts by state agencies on a random sampling basis, or upon request of the State Personal Service Contract Review Board under Section 25-9-120(3); (o)  At the discretion of the State Auditor, the Auditor may conduct risk assessments, as well as performance and compliance audits based on Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS) of any state-funded economic development program authorized under Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972.  After risk assessments or program audits, the State Auditor may conduct audits of those projects deemed high-risk, specifically as they identify any potential wrongdoing or noncompliance based on objectives of the economic development program.  The Auditor is granted authority to gather, audit and review data and information from the Mississippi Development Authority or any of its agents, the Department of Revenue, and when necessary under this paragraph, the recipient business or businesses or any other private, public or nonprofit entity with information relevant to the audit project.  The maximum amount the State Auditor may bill the oversight agency under this paragraph in any fiscal year is One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), based on reasonable and necessary expenses; (p)  To review and approve any independent auditor selected by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation in accordance with Section 27-115-89, to conduct an annual audit of the corporation; and (q)  To conduct audits or investigations of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation if, in the opinion of the State Auditor, conditions justify such audits or investigations. SECTION 8.  Section 9-9-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-9-23.  The county judge shall have power to issue writs, and to try matters, of habeas corpus on application to him or her therefor, or when made returnable before him or her by a superior judge.  He shall also have the power to order the issuance of writs of certiorari, supersedeas, attachments, and other remedial writs in all cases pending in, or within the jurisdiction of, his or her court.  He or she shall have the authority to issue search warrants in his or her county returnable to his or her own court or to any court of a justice of the peace within his or her county in the same manner as is provided by law and in Section 1 of this act for the issuance of search warrants by justices of the peace.  In all cases pending in, or within the jurisdiction of, his or her court, he or she shall have, in term time, and in vacation, the power to order, do or determine to the same extent and in the same manner as a justice of the peace or a circuit judge or a chancellor could do in term time or in vacation in such cases.  But he or she shall not have original power to issue writs of injunction, or other remedial writs in equity or in law except in those cases hereinabove specified as being within his or her jurisdiction:  Provided, however, that when any judge or chancellor authorized to issue such writs of injunction, or any other equitable or legal remedial writs hereinabove reserved, shall so direct in writing the hearing of application therefor may be by him or her referred to the county judge, in which event the said direction of the superior judge shall vest in the said county judge all authority to take such action on said application as the said superior judge could have taken under the right and the law, had the said application been at all times before the said superior judge.  The jurisdiction authorized under the foregoing proviso shall cease upon the denying or granting of the application. SECTION 9.  Section 21-23-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-23-7.  (1)  The municipal judge shall hold court in a public building designated by the governing authorities of the municipality, or may hold court in an adult detention center as provided under this subsection, and may hold court every day except Sundays and legal holidays if the business of the municipality so requires; provided, however, the municipal judge may hold court outside the boundaries of the municipality but not more than within a sixty-mile radius of the municipality to handle preliminary matters and criminal matters such as initial appearances and felony preliminary hearings.  The municipal judge may hold court outside the boundaries of the municipality but not more than within a one-mile radius of the municipality for any purpose; however, a municipal judge may hold court outside the boundaries of the municipality more than within a one-mile radius of the municipality when accepting a plea of a defendant at an adult detention center within the county.  The municipal judge shall have the jurisdiction to hear and determine, without a jury and without a record of the testimony, all cases charging violations of the municipal ordinances and state misdemeanor laws made offenses against the municipality and to punish offenders therefor as may be prescribed by law.  Except as otherwise provided by law, criminal proceedings shall be brought by sworn complaint filed in the municipal court. Such complaint shall state the essential elements of the offense charged and the statute or ordinance relied upon.  Such complaint shall not be required to conclude with a general averment that the offense is against the peace and dignity of the state or in violation of the ordinances of the municipality.  He may sit as a committing court in all felonies committed within the municipality, and he shall have the power to bind over the accused to the grand jury or to appear before the proper court having jurisdiction to try the same, and to set the amount of bail or refuse bail and commit the accused to jail in cases not bailable.  The municipal judge is a conservator of the peace within his municipality.  He may conduct preliminary hearings in all violations of the criminal laws of this state occurring within the municipality, and any person arrested for a violation of law within the municipality may be brought before him for initial appearance.  The municipal court shall have jurisdiction of any case remanded to it by a circuit court grand jury.  The municipal court shall have civil jurisdiction over actions filed pursuant to and as provided in Chapter 21, Title 93, * * * Chapter 21, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act. (2)  In the discretion of the court, where the objects of justice would be more likely met, as an alternative to imposition or payment of fine and/or incarceration, the municipal judge shall have the power to sentence convicted offenders to work on a public service project where the court has established such a program of public service by written guidelines filed with the clerk for public record. Such programs shall provide for reasonable supervision of the offender and the work shall be commensurate with the fine and/or incarceration that would have ordinarily been imposed.  Such program of public service may be utilized in the implementation of the provisions of Section 99-19-20, and public service work thereunder may be supervised by persons other than the sheriff. (3)  The municipal judge may solemnize marriages, take oaths, affidavits and acknowledgments, and issue orders, subpoenas, summonses, citations, warrants for search and arrest upon a finding of probable cause in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and other such process under seal of the court to any county or municipality, in a criminal case, to be executed by the lawful authority of the county or the municipality of the respondent, and enforce obedience thereto.  The absence of a seal shall not invalidate the process. (4)  When a person shall be charged with an offense in municipal court punishable by confinement, the municipal judge, being satisfied that such person is an indigent person and is unable to employ counsel, may, in the discretion of the court, appoint counsel from the membership of The Mississippi Bar residing in his county who shall represent him.  Compensation for appointed counsel in criminal cases shall be approved and allowed by the municipal judge and shall be paid by the municipality.  The maximum compensation shall not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for any one (1) case.  The governing authorities of a municipality may, in their discretion, appoint a public defender(s) who must be a licensed attorney and who shall receive a salary to be fixed by the governing authorities. (5)  The municipal judge of any municipality is hereby authorized to suspend the sentence and to suspend the execution of the sentence, or any part thereof, on such terms as may be imposed by the municipal judge.  However, the suspension of imposition or execution of a sentence hereunder may not be revoked after a period of two (2) years.  The municipal judge shall have the power to establish and operate a probation program, dispute resolution program and other practices or procedures appropriate to the judiciary and designed to aid in the administration of justice.  Any such program shall be established by the court with written policies and procedures filed with the clerk of the court for public record. Subsequent to original sentencing, the municipal judge, in misdemeanor cases, is hereby authorized to suspend sentence and to suspend the execution of a sentence, or any part thereof, on such terms as may be imposed by the municipal judge, if (a) the judge or his or her predecessor was authorized to order such suspension when the sentence was originally imposed; and (b) such conviction (i) has not been appealed; or (ii) has been appealed and the appeal has been voluntarily dismissed. (6)  Upon prior notice to the municipal prosecuting attorney and upon a showing in open court of rehabilitation, good conduct for a period of two (2) years since the last conviction in any court and that the best interest of society would be served, the court may, in its discretion, order the record of conviction of a person of any or all misdemeanors in that court expunged, and upon so doing the said person thereafter legally stands as though he had never been convicted of the said misdemeanor(s) and may lawfully so respond to any query of prior convictions.  This order of expunction does not apply to the confidential records of law enforcement agencies and has no effect on the driving record of a person maintained under Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other provision of said Title 63. (7)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, a person who was convicted in municipal court of a misdemeanor before reaching his twenty-third birthday, excluding conviction for a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may utilize the provisions of Section 99-19-71, to expunge such misdemeanor conviction. (8)  In the discretion of the court, a plea of nolo contendere may be entered to any charge in municipal court.  Upon the entry of a plea of nolo contendere the court shall convict the defendant of the offense charged and shall proceed to sentence the defendant according to law.  The judgment of the court shall reflect that the conviction was on a plea of nolo contendere.  An appeal may be made from a conviction on a plea of nolo contendere as in other cases. (9)  Upon execution of a sworn complaint charging a misdemeanor, the municipal court may, in its discretion and in lieu of an arrest warrant, issue a citation requiring the appearance of the defendant to answer the charge made against him.  On default of appearance, an arrest warrant may be issued for the defendant in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  The clerk of the court or deputy clerk may issue such citations. (10)  The municipal court shall have the power to make rules for the administration of the court's business, which rules, if any, shall be in writing filed with the clerk of the court and shall include the enactment of rules related to the court's authority to issue domestic abuse protection orders pursuant to Section 93-21-1 et seq. (11)  The municipal court shall have the power to impose punishment of a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or six (6) months imprisonment, or both, for contempt of court.  The municipal court may have the power to impose reasonable costs of court, not in excess of the following: Dismissal of any affidavit, complaint or charge in municipal court...................................... $ 50.00 Suspension of a minor's driver's license in lieu of conviction............................................. $ 50.00 Service of scire facias or return "not found"....... $  20.00 Causing search warrant to issue or causing prosecution without reasonable cause or refusing to cooperate after initiating action....................... $ 100.00 Certified copy of the court record................. $   5.00 Service of arrest warrant for failure to answer citation or traffic summons............................. $ 25.00 Jail cost per day - actual jail cost paid by the municipality but not to exceed......................................... $  35.00 Service of court documents related to the filing of a petition or issuance of a protection from domestic abuse order under Chapter 21, Title 93, * * *Chapter 21, Mississippi Code of 1972 ....................................................... $ 25.00 Any other item of court cost....................... $  50.00 No filing fee or such cost shall be imposed for the bringing of an action in municipal court. (12)  A municipal court judge shall not dismiss a criminal case but may transfer the case to the justice court of the county if the municipal court judge is prohibited from presiding over the case by the Canons of Judicial Conduct and provided that venue and jurisdiction are proper in the justice court.  Upon transfer of any such case, the municipal court judge shall give the municipal court clerk a written order to transmit the affidavit or complaint and all other records and evidence in the court's possession to the justice court by certified mail or to instruct the arresting officer to deliver such documents and records to the justice court.  There shall be no court costs charged for the transfer of the case to the justice court. (13)  A municipal court judge shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case or the person was found not guilty at trial. (14)  For violations of municipal ordinances related to real property, the municipal judge shall have the power to order a defendant to remedy violations within a reasonable time period as set by the judge, and at the discretion of the judge, the judge may simultaneously authorize the municipality, at its request, the option to remedy the violation itself, through the use of its own employees or its contractors, without further notice should the defendant fail to fully do so within the time period set by the judge.  Subsequent to the municipality remedying the violation, the municipality may petition the court to assess documented cleanup costs to the defendant, and, if, following a hearing on such petition, the judge determines (a) the violations were not remedied by the defendant within the time required by the court, (b) that the municipality remedied the violation itself after such time period expired and (c) that the costs incurred by the municipality were reasonable, the court may assess the costs to the defendant as a judgement, which may be enrolled in the office of the circuit clerk. SECTION 10.  Section 27-69-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-69-59.  When the commissioner has good reason to believe that tobacco is being kept, sold, offered for sale, or given away in violation of this chapter, or regulations issued under authority hereof, he may make affidavit of such fact, describing the place or thing to be searched, before any justice of the peace, mayor of any city, town or village, or county or circuit judge of any county in this state, and such justice of the peace, mayor or county or circuit judge shall issue a search warrant directed to the sheriff or any constable or any police officer in any city, town or village, commanding him to proceed in the day time, or in the night time, to enter by breaking, if necessary, and to diligently search any building, room in a building, outhouses, place, wagon, cart, buggy, motorcycle, motor truck, automobile, water or air craft, or other vehicle as may be designated in the affidavit and search warrant, and to seize such tobacco so possessed and to hold the same until disposed of by law, and to arrest the person or persons in possession or control of the same.  Any search or arrest authorized by this section shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. Such writ shall be returnable instanter, or on a day to be stated, and a copy shall be served on the owner or person in possession, if such person be present or readily found. If upon hearing, or the return of such search warrant, it shall appear that any tobacco unlawfully possessed were seized, the same shall be declared forfeited to this state, and shall be sold as provided in Section 27-69-55 of this chapter. SECTION 11.  Section 41-29-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-153.  (a)  The following are subject to forfeiture: (1)  All controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed or acquired in violation of this article or in violation of Article 5 of this chapter or Chapter 137 of this title; (2)  All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled substance in violation of this article or in violation of Article 5 of this chapter or Chapter 137 of this title; (3)  All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection; (4)  All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, sale, receipt, possession or concealment of property described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, however: A.  No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this article; B.  No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent; if the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the conveyance is a leased or rented conveyance, then the confiscating authority shall notify the owner of the conveyance within five (5) days of the confiscation; C.  A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; D.  A conveyance is not subject to forfeiture for a violation of Section 41-29-139(c)(2)(A) 1, 2 or (B)1 or (C)1, 2, 3; (5)  All money, deadly weapons, books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this article or in violation of Article 5 of this chapter or Chapter 137 of this title; (6)  All drug paraphernalia as defined in Section 41-29-105(v); and (7)  Everything of value, including real estate, furnished, or intended to be furnished, in exchange for a controlled substance in violation of this article, all proceeds traceable to such an exchange, and all monies, negotiable instruments, businesses or business investments, securities, and other things of value used, or intended to be used, to facilitate any violation of this article.  All monies, coin and currency found in close proximity to forfeitable controlled substances, to forfeitable drug manufacturing or distributing paraphernalia, or to forfeitable records of the importation, manufacture or distribution of controlled substances are presumed to be forfeitable under this paragraph; the burden of proof is upon claimants of the property to rebut this presumption. A.  No property shall be forfeited under the provisions of subsection (a)(7) of this section, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by him to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent. B.  Neither personal property encumbered by a bona fide security interest nor real estate encumbered by a bona fide mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance shall be forfeited under the provisions of subsection (a)(7) of this section, to the extent of the interest of the secured party or the interest of the mortgagee, holder of a deed of trust, lien or encumbrance by reason of any act or omission established by him to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent. (b)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by the bureau, local law enforcement officers, enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, highway patrolmen, the board, the State Board of Pharmacy, or law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Revenue or Mississippi Department of Health acting with their duties in accordance with the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property.  Seizure without process may be made if: (1)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant; (2)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this article; (3)  The bureau, the board, local law enforcement officers, enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, or highway patrolmen, the State Board of Pharmacy, or law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Revenue or Mississippi Department of Health acting with their duties in accordance with the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, have probable cause to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; (4)  The bureau, local law enforcement officers, enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, highway patrolmen, the board, the State Board of Pharmacy, or law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Revenue or Mississippi Department of Health acting with their duties in accordance with the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, have probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this article; or (5)  The seizing law enforcement agency obtained a seizure warrant as described in subsection (f) of this section and in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (c)  Controlled substances listed in Schedule I of Section 41-29-113 that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this article are contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.  Controlled substances listed in the said Schedule I, which are seized or come into the possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state. (d)  Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II of Sections 41-29-113 and 41-29-115 may be derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this article, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. (e)  The failure, upon demand by the bureau and/or local law enforcement officers, or their authorized agents, or highway patrolmen designated by the bureau, the board, the State Board of Pharmacy, or law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Revenue or Mississippi Department of Health acting with their duties in accordance with the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate registration, or proof that he is the holder thereof, constitutes authority for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants. (f)  (1)  When any property is seized under the Uniform Controlled Substances Law, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, by a law enforcement agency with the intent to be forfeited, the law enforcement agency that seized the property shall obtain a seizure warrant from the county or circuit court having jurisdiction of such property within seventy-two (72) hours of any seizure, excluding weekends and holidays.  Any law enforcement agency that fails to obtain a seizure warrant within seventy-two (72) hours as required by this section shall notify the person from whom the property was seized that it will not be forfeited and shall provide written instructions advising the person how to retrieve the seized property. (2)  A circuit or county judge having jurisdiction of any property other than a controlled substance, raw material or paraphernalia, may issue a seizure warrant upon proper oath or affirmation from a law enforcement agency.  The law enforcement agency that is seeking a seizure warrant shall provide the following information to the judge: A.  Probable cause to believe that the property was used or intended to be used in violation of this article; B.  The name of the person from whom the property was seized; and C.  A detailed description of the property which is seized, including the value of the property. (3)  This subsection does not apply to seizures performed pursuant to Section 41-29-157 when property is specifically set forth in a search and seizure warrant. SECTION 12.  Section 41-29-159, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-159.  (a)  Any officer or employee of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, investigative unit of the State Board of Pharmacy, investigative unit of the State Board of Medical Licensure, investigative unit of the State Board of Dental Examiners, investigative unit of the Mississippi Board of Nursing, investigative unit of the State Board of Optometry, any duly sworn peace officer of the State of Mississippi, any enforcement officer of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, or any highway patrolman, may, while engaged in the performance of his statutory duties: (1)  Carry firearms; (2)  Execute and serve search warrants * * *, and arrest warrants in compliance with Section 1 of this act, subpoenas, and summonses issued under the authority of this state; (3)  Make arrests without warrant for any offense under this article committed in his presence, or if he has probable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed or is committing a crime; and (4)  Make seizures of property pursuant to this article. (b)  As divided among the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, the State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Medical Licensure,  the State Board of Dental Examiners, the Mississippi Board of Nursing and the State Board of Optometry, the primary responsibility of the illicit street traffic or other illicit traffic of drugs is delegated to agents of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics.  The State Board of Pharmacy is delegated the responsibility of regulating and checking the legitimate drug traffic among pharmacists, pharmacies, hospitals, nursing homes, drug manufacturers, and any other related professions and facilities with the exception of the medical, dental, nursing, optometric and veterinary professions.  The State Board of Medical Licensure is responsible for regulating and checking the legitimate drug traffic among physicians, podiatrists and veterinarians.  The Mississippi Board of Dental Examiners is responsible for regulating and checking the legitimate drug traffic among dentists and dental hygienists.  The Mississippi Board of Nursing is responsible for regulating and checking the legitimate drug traffic among nurses.  The State Board of Optometry is responsible for regulating and checking the legitimate drug traffic among optometrists. (c)  The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit or preclude the detection or arrest of persons in violation of Section 41-29-139 by any local law enforcement officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff or peace officer. (d)  Agents of the bureau are authorized to investigate the circumstances of deaths which are caused by drug overdose or which are believed to be caused by drug overdose, and health care providers, coroners and law enforcement officers shall notify the bureau of any death caused by a drug overdose within twenty-four (24) hours. (e)  Any person who shall impersonate in any way the director or any agent, or who shall in any manner hold himself out as being, or represent himself as being, an officer or agent of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. SECTION 13.  Section 41-29-161, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-161.  Any officer or employee of the Mississippi Bureau of Drug Enforcement who is authorized to investigate, carry firearms, serve search warrants in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and do all things as set forth in this article shall prior to entering upon the discharge of his duties enter into a good and sufficient surety bond in the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) with a surety company authorized and doing business within the State of Mississippi.  The said bond herein is conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of his office.  All premiums shall be paid as are other expenses of the bureau. SECTION 14.  Section 43-13-221, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-13-221.  The Attorney General, acting through the Director of the Fraud Control Unit, may, in any case involving alleged violations of this article, conduct an investigation or prosecution.  In conducting such actions, the Attorney General, acting through the director, shall have all the powers of a district attorney, including the powers to issue or cause to be issued subpoenas or other process. Persons employed by the Attorney General as investigators in the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit shall serve as law enforcement officers as defined in Section 45-6-3, and they shall be empowered to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants in compliance with Section 1 of this act and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi. SECTION 15.  Section 43-13-229, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-13-229.  (1)  During any investigation under this article, the Attorney General, acting through the Director of the Fraud Control Unit, shall have the right to audit and to inspect the records of any health care provider or vendor of Medicaid benefits. (2)  Reimbursement under the Medicaid program shall not be available for services furnished by a provider or vendor who is otherwise eligible for Medicaid benefits during any period when such provider or vendor has refused to provide the Attorney General and the Director of the Fraud Control Unit such information as the unit may request in order to complete its investigation. (3)  Suspension of Medicaid reimbursement payments shall continue during all periods during which any part of any requested records are not produced, notwithstanding any administrative, legal or other proceedings which may be brought or maintained by such provider or vendor or by any other party to forestall, modify or prevent the request for records. (4)  As used in this section, "requested records" means those records required by the unit for investigative or prosecutorial purposes, and requested by subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, grand jury subpoena, administrative demand, search warrant executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act, or other process, demand or written request. SECTION 16.  Section 45-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-11-1.  (1)  The Commissioner of Insurance is by virtue of his office the State Fire Marshal and shall appoint the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal who, along with his employees, shall be designated as a division of the Insurance Department.  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall be a person qualified by experience and training and thoroughly knowledgeable in the areas of arson investigation and prevention, fire prevention, fire fighting and the training of firemen.  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Commissioner of Insurance. (2)  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall employ such deputy state fire marshals as are necessary and in accordance with availability of funds.  Deputy fire marshals shall be deployed across the state in order to provide effective service to fire scenes. (3)  It shall be the duty of the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal to investigate, by himself or his deputy, the origin of every fire occurring within the state to which his attention is called by the chief of the fire department or other law enforcement authority of any county or municipality.  It shall also be his duty to investigate any case requested by any party in interest, whenever, in his judgment, there be sufficient evidence or circumstances indicating that such fire may be of incendiary origin.  All county and municipal law enforcement authorities shall cooperate with the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal in such investigation.  This section shall not be construed to impair the duty and power of county and municipal law enforcement authorities to investigate any fire occurring within his or their jurisdiction. (4)  (a)  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal and deputy state fire marshals shall have the following powers: (i)  To arrest without warrant subject to the provisions of Section 1 of this act any person or persons committing or attempting to commit any misdemeanor or felony within their presence or view but only such violations of law or violations of regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 49, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972; (ii)  To pursue and so arrest any person committing an offense as described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to and at any place in the State of Mississippi where he may go or be; (iii)  To execute all warrants and search warrants in compliance with Section 1 of this act related to, and investigate any violation of the laws and regulations related to this chapter and Chapter 49, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972, and prevent, arrest and apprehend such violators; and (iv)  To aid and assist any peace officer of this state or any other state if requested, or in manhunts or natural disasters within the state, and upon the consent of the State Fire Marshal, within the jurisdiction of the called event. (b)  Nothing herein shall be construed as granting the State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal or deputy state fire marshals general police powers. (c) All deputy state fire marshals hired on or after July 1, 2013, shall be required to complete or have completed the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program and shall meet the standards of the program. (5)  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal shall maintain in his office a record of all fires investigated by him or his deputy, including evidence obtained as to the origin of each such fire. (6)  Such record shall at all times be subject to inspection by any party of interest in the fire loss; provided, however, that no record or report of an investigation shall be subject to inspection pending such investigation or while same is in progress, and if a report of an investigation contains any evidence of arson or other felony, same shall not be subject to inspection by any person other than the district attorney and county attorney of the county in which such evidence indicates that arson or other felony may have been committed, except upon the written approval of such district attorney or the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.  Provided that in cases where a person has been arrested for the crimes of arson, attempted arson, or any other felony, the defendant or his attorney shall have access to these records.  Any physical evidence of arson or other felony shall be delivered to the custody of the sheriff of the county wherein such fire occurred. (7)  The State Chief Deputy Fire Marshal may appoint, with the consent of the Commissioner of Insurance, a State Chief Assistant Deputy Fire Marshal, who shall have power, during the chief deputy's absence or inability to act due to any cause, to perform any and all of the duties of the chief deputy.  The chief assistant deputy shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Commissioner of Insurance. SECTION 17.  Section 47-5-28, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-28.  The commissioner shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To implement and administer laws and policy relating to corrections and coordinate the efforts of the department with those of the federal government and other state departments and agencies, county governments, municipal governments, and private agencies concerned with providing offender services; (b)  To establish standards, in cooperation with other state agencies having responsibility as provided by law, provide technical assistance, and exercise the requisite supervision as it relates to correctional programs over all state-supported adult correctional facilities and community-based programs; (c)  To promulgate and publish such rules, regulations and policies of the department as are needed for the efficient government and maintenance of all facilities and programs in accord insofar as possible with currently accepted standards of adult offender care and treatment; (d)  To provide the Parole Board with suitable and sufficient office space and support resources and staff necessary to conduct Parole Board business under the guidance of the Chairman of the Parole Board; (e)  To contract for transitional reentry center beds that will be used as noncorrections housing for offenders released from the department on parole, probation or post-release supervision but do not have appropriate housing available upon release.  At least one hundred (100) but no more than eight hundred (800) transitional reentry center beds contracted by the department and chosen by the Parole Board shall be available for the Parole Board to place parolees without appropriate housing; (f)  To designate deputy commissioners while performing their officially assigned duties relating to the custody, control, transportation, recapture or arrest of any offender within the jurisdiction of the department or any offender of any jail, penitentiary, public workhouse or overnight lockup of the state or any political subdivision thereof not within the jurisdiction of the department, to the status of peace officers anywhere in the state in any matter relating to the custody, control, transportation or recapture of such offender, and shall have the status of law enforcement officers and peace officers as contemplated by Sections 45-6-3, 97-3-7 and 97-3-19. For the purpose of administration and enforcement of this chapter, deputy commissioners of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, who are certified by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training, have the powers of a law enforcement officer of this state.  Such powers shall include to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi in compliance with Section 1 of this act, while performing their officially assigned duties relating to the custody, control, transportation, recapture or arrest of any offender within the jurisdiction of the department or any offender of any jail, penitentiary, public workhouse or overnight lockup of the state or any political subdivision thereof not within the jurisdiction of the department in any matter relating to the custody, control, transportation or recapture of such offender; (g)  To make an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature reflecting the activities of the department and make recommendations for improvement of the services to be performed by the department; (h)  To cooperate fully with periodic independent internal investigations of the department and to file the report with the Governor and the Legislature; (i)  To contract with licensed special care facilities for paroled inmates to provide authorized medical services and support services for medically frail inmates who have been paroled and who have voluntary submitted to the Department of Corrections an address to one of the licensed care facilities to receive such services; and (j)  To perform such other duties necessary to effectively and efficiently carry out the purposes of the department as may be directed by the Governor. SECTION 18.  Section 49-1-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-1-43.  (1)  The director shall have general supervision and control of all conservation officers, and shall enforce all the laws and regulations of the state relating to wild animals, birds and fish, and shall exercise all necessary powers incident thereto not specifically conferred on the department. (2)  The director, with the approval of the commission, shall make to the Governor and the Legislature a report covering the operation of the department for the preceding fiscal year. (3)  It shall be the duty of all conservation officers to enforce, and to obey and carry out all instructions and directions of the department with respect to the enforcement of the laws and regulations relating to wild animals, birds and fish. (4)  The director and each conservation officer shall have power, and it shall be the duty of the director and of each conservation officer: (a)  To execute all warrants and search warrants for a violation of the laws and regulations relating to wild animals, birds and fish and to serve subpoenas issued for the examination and investigation or trial of offenses against any of the laws or regulations; (b)  To search where the conservation officer has cause to believe and does believe that animals, birds or fish, or any parts thereof, or the nest or eggs of birds, or spawn or eggs of fish are possessed in violation of law or regulation and in such case to examine, without warrant, the contents of any boat, car, automobile or other vehicle, box, locker, basket, creel, crate, game bag or other package, to ascertain whether any law or regulation for the protection of animals, birds or fish have been or are being violated, and to use such force as may be necessary for the purpose of such examination and inspection; (c)  With a search warrant to search and examine the contents of any dwelling house, room, building or premises of any person suspected of violating any law or regulation, to seize all animals, birds or fish, or parts thereof, or nests or eggs of birds taken in violation of law or regulation, or showing evidence of illegal taking and to seize and confiscate all devices illegally used in taking animals, birds or fish; (d)  To arrest, without warrant, any person committing or attempting to commit a misdemeanor, felony or a breach of the peace within his presence or view and to pursue and so arrest any person committing an offense in any place in the state where the person may go or be; to aid and assist any peace officer of this state or any other state if requested, in manhunts or natural disasters within the state; and (e)  To exercise other powers of peace officers in the enforcement of game laws or regulations or of a judgment for the violation thereof, as are not herein specifically provided. (5)  In all cases of arrest without warrant, the person making such arrest must inform the accused of the object and cause of the arrest in compliance with Section 1 of this act, except when he is in the actual commission of the offense or is arrested on pursuit. (6)  No conservation officer shall compromise or settle out of court any violation of this chapter, or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds or fish. (7)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as granting conservation officers general police powers. (8)  Citations issued by a conservation officer for any violation of the laws for the protection of wild animals, birds and fish, the trespass laws, the litter laws, and the boating laws shall be issued on a uniform citation form consisting of an original and at least two (2) copies.  Such citation shall show, among other necessary information, the name of the issuing officer, the name of the court in which the cause is to be heard, and the date and time the person charged with a violation is to appear to answer the charge.  The uniform citation form shall make a provision on it for information that will constitute a complaint charging the offense for which the citation was issued and, when duly sworn to and filed with a court of competent jurisdiction, prosecution may proceed under that complaint. SECTION 19.  Section 49-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-15-21.  (1)  The executive director shall appoint the necessary enforcement officers for the administration of this chapter.  The salary of all enforcement officers employed shall be as determined by the State Personnel Board.  However, the members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) shall serve without pay, and shall not be employees of the State of Mississippi for purposes of the State Personnel System, the Workers' Compensation Law, the Public Employees' Retirement System or the State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan. (2)  All enforcement officers shall be experienced and qualified persons thoroughly familiar with the seafood business and shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age and be a high school graduate or its equivalent.  The enforcement officers shall diligently enforce all laws and regulations for the protection, propagation, preservation or conservation of all saltwater aquatic life of the State of Mississippi, and they are hereby constituted peace officers of the State of Mississippi, with full police power and jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi, inclusive of all federal laws within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi and waters and resources under management of the state, and all regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. Enforcement officers may exercise such powers in any county of the State of Mississippi and on any waters of the state, and they are hereby authorized to carry firearms or other weapons, concealed or otherwise, and they shall investigate all persons, corporations and otherwise who are alleged to have violated any laws, and make affidavits, arrests and serve papers of any court of competent jurisdiction, in like manner as is provided for sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, when the same shall be in connection with the enforcement of the seafood laws of the State of Mississippi and such other laws and regulations of this state as the department may designate.  The enforcement officers may seize at any time aquatic life caught, taken or transported in a manner contrary to the laws of this state, and may confiscate and dispose of the same.  Any net or other paraphernalia used or employed in connection with a violation may be seized, and forfeiture proceedings may be instituted. Enforcement officers may draft the aid of captains, crews and boats or licensed vessels to enforce this chapter and may, without warrant, board and search vessels or vehicles.  The application for any license or permit from the department to catch, fish, take, transport or handle or process any form of aquatic life, or the taking, catching, transporting or handling or processing of any and all aquatic life in this state shall constitute acquiescence and agreement upon the part of the owners, captains and crews, employers and dealers to the provisions of this chapter and the agreement that enforcement officers may exercise the authority granted under the provisions hereof. (3)  Prior to entering into performance of their duties or delegations or as soon after appointment as possible, each enforcement officer, at the expense of the department, shall attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy or other law enforcement training program approved under Section 45-6-7.  However, members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) of this section may attend the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy at the expense of the department if it deems the training necessary or desirable.  No enforcement officer shall be entitled to payment of salary after the first twelve (12) months in office if he has either failed to attend the academy or has failed to comply with other qualifications or successfully complete any law enforcement qualification examinations as the director deems necessary.  The enforcement officers shall, on a periodic basis, be required to attend additional advanced courses in law enforcement in order that they will be properly improved and trained in the modern, technical advances of law enforcement. (4)  (a)  There is hereby created an Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit, hereinafter termed "the reserve," to assist the enforcement officers in the performance of their duties under this chapter.  The reserve shall consist of volunteers who are approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources or his designee.  The members of the reserve shall serve without pay.  Reserve officers shall be in such numbers as determined by the enforcement needs, with the maximum strength of reserve officers limited to the same number as enforcement officers. (b)  To be eligible for membership in the reserve, an applicant must be twenty-one (21) years of age, be a high school graduate or its equivalent, be in good physical condition, have a Mississippi driver's license, be in good standing with the community, be available for training and duty, not be a member of any police, auxiliary police, civil defense, or private security agency, have never been convicted of a felony, and have one (1) of the following: (i)  An honorable discharge or honorable separation certificate from one (1) of the United States military services; (ii)  Three (3) years of responsible post-high school work experience that required the ability to deal effectively with individuals and groups of persons; (iii)  Successful completion of sixty (60) semester hours at an accredited college or university; or (iv)  The qualifications as are outlined in this section for enforcement officers. Members of the immediate family of enforcement officers shall not be eligible for the reserve unless a special waiver is granted. Upon acceptance into the reserve, members shall receive a temporary appointment for one (1) year. During this year of temporary status, members must successfully complete the required training and must qualify on the same firearms course as enforcement officers. (c)  The reserve shall be under the leadership and direction of the executive director or his designee.  The training of the reserve shall be conducted by an enforcement officer.  The reserve shall meet at least once each month for the purpose of training and transacting any business as may come before it.  The executive director shall be notified in writing of all meetings of the reserve and the time and place of the meetings shall be recorded with the executive director. The executive director shall prepare a reserve officer's manual with the advice and consent of the department.  The manual shall include, but is not limited to, the following:  activities and operations, training, administration and duties.  During active service, the reserve shall be under the direction of the executive director or his designated representative.  When a reserve officer is on active duty and assigned to a specific enforcement officer, he shall be under the direct supervision of that officer.  Reserve officers serve at the discretion of the executive director and may be dismissed by him.  Reserve officers shall furnish their own uniforms and other personal equipment if the executive director does not provide such items. (d)  The executive director may require members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit to attend officer reserve training programs conducted by county or municipal agencies. (e)  The executive director may issue uniforms to such reserve officers and may authorize the issuance of any state equipment necessary for the reserve officers to adequately assist law enforcement officers.  The executive director may develop a reserve officer identification system to accomplish the issuance of such items in accordance with the State Auditor guidelines. (f)  If the executive director determines that a member of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit may attend a training program as authorized under this section, it shall require that reserve officer to sign an agreement, prior to attending a training program, which shall stipulate that if the reserve officer accepts employment from any other public or private law enforcement agency within three (3) years after completion of his training program, the reserve officer or the respective hiring law enforcement agency shall reimburse the department for the total cost of his training program.  By October 1 of each year, the department shall provide the Conservation and Water Resources Committee of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Ports and Marine Resources Committee of the Mississippi Senate a listing which contains each name and the respective cost of training each reserve officer received during the previous year.  Any warrants executed under the authority of this section shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 20.  Section 67-1-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-17.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for any person to have or possess either alcoholic beverages or personal property intended for use in violating the provisions of this article, or regulations prescribed under this article, or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972.  No property rights shall exist in any such personal property or alcoholic beverages.  All such personal property and alcoholic beverages shall be considered contraband and shall be seized and forfeited to the State of Mississippi. (2)  The following are subject to forfeiture: (a)  All alcoholic beverages which have been manufactured, distilled, distributed, dispensed or acquired in violation of this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; (b)  All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind which are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing or exporting any alcoholic beverage in violation of this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; (c)  All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container for property described in items (a) or (b) of this subsection; (d)  All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt, possession or concealment, of property described in item (a) of this subsection which is in excess of six (6) gallons or of property described in item (b) of this subsection; however, (i)  No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; (ii)  No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent; if the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the conveyance is a leased or rented conveyance, then the confiscating authority shall notify the owner of the conveyance within five (5) days of the confiscation; and (iii)  A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; (e)  All money, deadly weapons, books, records and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972. (3)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and its agents, local law enforcement officers, Mississippi Highway Patrol officers and other law enforcement personnel charged by Section 67-1-91, with enforcing the provisions of this article upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure without process may be made if: (a)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or an administrative inspection under Section 67-1-37(k); (b)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this article or Chapter 31 of Article 97, Mississippi Code of 1972; or (c)  The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the State Tax Commission and other law enforcement personnel described in this subsection have probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of this article or Chapter 31 of Article 97, Mississippi Code of 1972. (4)  Alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained under the authority of this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is deemed to be in the custody of the agent or agency so seizing the property and subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over the property.  When such property is seized it may be retained as evidence until final disposition of the cause in which such property is involved, and then the agent or agency so seizing the property shall physically transfer such alcoholic beverage or raw material to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the State Tax Commission together with an appropriate inventory of the items seized. Alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained under the authority of this section shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 67-1-18. (5)  Any property other than alcoholic beverages and raw materials seized or detained pursuant to this article or Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be deemed to be in the custody of the agent or agency so seizing the property and subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over the property.  When such property is seized it may be retained as evidence until the final disposition of the cause in which such property is involved. Property seized or detained other than alcoholic beverages or raw materials shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Sections 67-1-93, 67-1-95 and 67-1-97. SECTION 21.  Section 69-29-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 69-29-1.  (1)  (a)  There is established the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau. (b)  The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall appoint a director of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau.  Such director shall have at least five (5) years of  law enforcement experience.  Such director shall be responsible solely to the supervision of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce and to no other person or entity.  Such director may be discharged only for just cause shown. (c)  The director may employ twelve (12) agricultural and livestock theft investigators.  Each investigator shall be certified as a law enforcement officer, successfully completing at least a nine-week training course, in accordance with Section 45-6-11. The curriculum for the training of constables shall not be sufficient for meeting the certification requirements of this paragraph.  In the selection of investigators under this section, preference shall be given to persons who have previous law enforcement experience. (d)  The director appointed under this section, under the direction, control and supervision of the commissioner, and the investigators employed under this section shall perform only the duties described in subsection (2) of this section and shall not be assigned any other duties. (2)  The director appointed under this section and the investigators employed under this section shall have the following powers, duties and authority: (a)  To enforce all of the provisions of Sections 69-29-9 and 69-29-11, and particularly those portions requiring persons transporting livestock to have a bill of sale in their possession; to make investigations of violations of such sections and to arrest persons violating same; (b)  To enforce all of the laws of this state enacted for the purpose of preventing the theft of livestock, poultry, timber and agricultural, aquacultural and timber products and implements; to make investigations of violations thereof and to arrest persons violating same; (c)  To cooperate with all regularly constituted law enforcement officers relative to the matters herein set forth; (d)  To serve warrants and other process emanating from any court of lawful jurisdiction, including search warrants, in all matters herein set forth; (e)  To carry proper credentials evidencing their authority, which shall be exhibited to any person making demand therefor; (f)  To make arrests without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act in all matters herein set forth in cases where same is authorized under the constitutional and general laws of this state; (g)  To handle the registration of brands of cattle and livestock; (h)  To investigate, prevent, apprehend and arrest those persons anywhere in the state who are violating any of the laws administered by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, including, but not limited to, all agriculture-related crimes; (i)  To access and examine records of any person, business or entity that harvests, loads, carries, receives or manufactures timber products as defined in this section. Each such person or entity shall permit the director or any investigator of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau to examine records of the sale, transfer or purchase of timber or timber products, including, but not limited to, contracts, load tickets, settlement sheets, drivers' logs, invoices, checks and any other records or documents related to an ongoing investigation of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau; (j)  To conduct training for law enforcement regarding laws enforced by the bureau and to assist any other law enforcement agencies in responding to matters that may be related to agriculture and commerce in the State of Mississippi and in cases of natural disasters or other disasters to respond as needed or as requested by other agencies; and (k)  To maintain a registry of reports of stolen agriculture-related vehicles. (3)  The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall furnish such investigators with such vehicles, equipment and supplies as may be necessary.  All expenses of same, and all other expenses incurred in the administration of this section, shall be paid from such appropriation as may be made by the Legislature. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Revenue and its agents and employees shall cooperate with such investigators by furnishing to them information as to any possible or suspected violations of any of the laws mentioned herein, including specifically Section 69-29-27, and in any other lawful manner. (5)  The conservation officers of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks are authorized to cooperate with and assist the agricultural and livestock theft investigators in the enforcement and apprehension of violators of laws regarding agricultural and livestock theft. (6)  The Mississippi Forestry Commission employees are excluded from any timber and timber products theft investigative responsibilities except when technical expertise is needed and requested through the State Forester or his designee. (7)  For the purposes of this section, "timber product" means timber of all kinds, species or sizes, including, but not limited to, logs, lumber, poles, pilings, posts, blocks, bolts, cordwood and pulpwood, pine stumpwood, pine knots or other distillate wood, crossties, turpentine (crude gum), pine straw, firewood and all other products derived from timber or trees that have a sale or commercial value. SECTION 22.  Section 93-29-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-29-17.  Warrant to take physical custody of child.  (a)  If a petition under this chapter contains allegations, and the court finds that there is a credible risk that the child is imminently likely to be wrongfully removed, the court may issue an ex parte warrant to take physical custody of the child. (b)  The respondent on a petition under subsection (a) must be afforded an opportunity to be heard at the earliest possible time after the ex parte warrant is executed, but not later than the next judicial day unless a hearing on that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. (c)  An ex parte warrant under subsection (a) to take physical custody of a child must: (1)  Recite the facts upon which a determination of a credible risk of imminent wrongful removal of the child is based; (2)  Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; (3)  State the date and time for the hearing on the petition; and (4)  Provide for the safe interim placement of the child pending further order of the court. (d)  If feasible, before issuing a warrant and before determining the placement of the child after the warrant is executed, the court may order a search of the relevant databases of the National Crime Information Center system and similar state databases to determine if either the petitioner or respondent has a history of domestic violence, stalking or child abuse or neglect. (e)  The petition and warrant must be served on the respondent when or immediately after the child is taken into physical custody and in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (f)  A warrant to take physical custody of a child, issued by this state or another state, is enforceable throughout this state.  If the court finds that a less intrusive remedy will not be effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child.  If required by exigent circumstances, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour. (g)  If the court finds, after a hearing, that a petitioner sought an ex parte warrant under subsection (a) for the purpose of harassment or in bad faith, the court may award the respondent reasonable attorney's fees, costs and expenses. (h)  This chapter does not affect the availability of relief allowed under the law of this state other than this chapter. SECTION 23.  Section 97-3-54.7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-3-54.7.  (1)  In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties provided by law, any property used in the commission of a violation of this act shall be forfeited as provided herein. (a)  The following property shall be subject to forfeiture if used or intended for use as an instrumentality in or used in furtherance of a violation of this act: (i)  Conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels; (ii)  Books, records, telecommunication equipment, or computers; (iii)  Money or weapons; (iv)  Everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in exchange for an act in violation and all proceeds traceable to the exchange; (v)  Negotiable instruments and securities; (vi)  Any property, real or personal, directly or indirectly acquired or received in a violation or as an inducement to violate; (vii)  Any property traceable to proceeds from a violation; and (viii)  Any real property, including any right, title and interest in the whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land used in furtherance of a violation of this act. (b)  (i)  No property used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the property is a consenting party or privy to a violation of this act; (ii)  No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent; if the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the property is a leased or rented property, then the confiscating authority shall notify the owner of the property within five (5) days of the confiscation or within five (5) days of forming reason to believe that the property is a leased or rented property; (iii)  Forfeiture of a property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. (2)  No property shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by him to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent. (3)  Seizure without process may be made if the seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant. (4)  (a)  When any property is seized under this section, proceedings shall be instituted within a reasonable period of time from the date of seizure or the subject property shall be immediately returned to the party from whom seized. (b)  A petition for forfeiture shall be filed by the Attorney General or a district attorney in the name of the State of Mississippi, the county, or the municipality, and may be filed in the county in which the seizure is made, the county in which the criminal prosecution is brought, or the county in which the owner of the seized property is found.  Forfeiture proceedings may be brought in the circuit court or the county court if a county court exists in the county and the value of the seized property is within the jurisdictional limits of the county court as set forth in Section 9-9-21.  A copy of the petition shall be served upon the following persons by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases: (i)  The owner of the property, if address is known; (ii)  Any secured party who has registered his lien or filed a financing statement as provided by law, if the identity of the secured party can be ascertained by the entity filing the petition by making a good faith effort to ascertain the identity of the secured party; (iii)  Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest of whom the seizing law enforcement agency has actual knowledge; and (iv)  Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized. (5)  If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle has been titled, inquiry of the Department of Revenue shall be made as to what the records of the Department of Revenue show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest that affects the vehicle. (6)  If the property is a motor vehicle and is not titled in the State of Mississippi, then an attempt shall be made to ascertain the name and address of the person in whose name the vehicle is licensed, and if the vehicle is licensed in a state which has in effect a certificate of title law, inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state shall be made as to what the records of the agency show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest or other instrument in the nature of a security device that affects the vehicle. (7)  If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is required by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security interest affecting the property and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that a financing statement covering the security interest has been filed under the laws of this state, inquiry of the appropriate office designated in Section 75-9-501, shall be made as to what the records show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, has filed a financing statement affecting the property. (8)  If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, inquiry of the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be made as to what the records of the Federal Aviation Administration show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the property. (9)  If the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when it was seized, or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage or deed of trust that affects the property, the record owner and also any lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, or holder of an encumbrance, mortgage or deed of trust that affects the property is to be named in the petition of forfeiture and is to be served with process in the same manner as in civil cases. (10)  If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a copy of the petition of forfeiture, or if no person was in possession of the property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the property is unknown, there shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to "the Unknown Owner of _______________," filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed description of the property subject to forfeiture.  Service by publication shall contain the other requisites prescribed in Section 11-33-41, and shall be served as provided in Section 11-33-37, for publication of notice for attachments at law. (11)  No proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section has been complied with.  Any answer received from an inquiry required by this section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing. (12)  (a)  An owner of a property that has been seized shall file an answer within thirty (30) days after the completion of service of process.  If an answer is not filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the property to the seizing law enforcement agency.  If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty (30) days of filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court if court would not be in session within thirty (30) days after filing the answer.  The court may postpone the forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending against the owner upon request of any party. (b)  If the owner of the property has filed an answer denying that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the petitioner to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture.  However, if an answer has not been filed by the owner of the property, the petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and is prima facie evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture.  The burden of proof placed upon the petitioner in regard to property forfeited under the provisions of this chapter shall be by a preponderance of the evidence. (c)  At the hearing any claimant of any right, title or interest in the property may prove his lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage or deed of trust to be bona fide and created without knowledge or consent that the property was to be used so as to cause the property to be subject to forfeiture. (d)  If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the judge shall forfeit the property.  However, if proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party, other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, or any holder of a bona fide encumbrance, mortgage or deed of trust is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall order the property released to him.  If the interest is less than the present value of the property and if the proof shows that the property is subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the property forfeited. (13)  Unless otherwise provided herein, all personal property which is forfeited under this section shall be liquidated and, after deduction of court costs and the expense of liquidation, the proceeds shall be divided as follows: (a)  If only one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited in the Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation Fund, and fifty percent (50%) shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the participating law enforcement agency. (b)  If more than one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited in the Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation Fund, twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the law enforcement agency whose officers initiated the criminal case and twenty-five percent (25%) shall be divided equitably between or among the other participating law enforcement agencies, and shall be deposited and credited to the budgets of the participating law enforcement agencies.  In the event that the other participating law enforcement agencies cannot agree on the division of their twenty-five percent (25%), a petition shall be filed by any one of them in the court in which the civil forfeiture case is brought and the court shall make an equitable division. (14)  All money forfeited under this section shall be divided, deposited and credited in the same manner as provided in subsection (13). (15)  All real estate forfeited under the provisions of this section shall be sold to the highest and best bidder at a public auction for cash, the auction to be conducted by the chief law enforcement officer of the initiating law enforcement agency, or his designee, at such place, on such notice and in accordance with the same procedure, as far as practicable, as is required in the case of sales of land under execution at law.  The proceeds of the sale shall first be applied to the cost and expense in administering and conducting the sale, then to the satisfaction of all mortgages, deeds of trust, liens and encumbrances of record on the property. The remaining proceeds shall be divided, forwarded and deposited in the same manner as provided in subsection (13). (16)  (a)  Any county or municipal law enforcement agency may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes all property described in subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section that has been forfeited to the agency if it is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest.  The county or municipal law enforcement agency may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest so that the property can be released for its use.  If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law, the law enforcement agency shall be deemed to be the purchaser, and the certificate of title shall be issued to it as required by subsection (9) of this section. (b)  (i)  If a vehicle is forfeited to or transferred to a sheriff's department, then the sheriff may transfer the vehicle to the county for official or governmental use as the board of supervisors may direct. (ii)  If a vehicle is forfeited to or transferred to a police department, then the police chief may transfer the vehicle to the municipality for official or governmental use as the governing authority of the municipality may direct. (c)  If a motor vehicle forfeited to a county or municipal law enforcement agency becomes obsolete or is no longer needed for official or governmental purposes, it may be disposed of in accordance with Section 19-7-5 or in the manner provided by law for disposing of municipal property. (17)  The forfeiture procedure set forth in this section is the sole remedy of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere therewith by replevin, injunction, supersedeas or in any other manner. SECTION 24.  Section 97-17-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-17-4.  (1)  All property, real or personal, including money, used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of a provision of Section 97-17-1 or 97-17-3 is subject to civil forfeiture to the state pursuant to the provisions of this section; provided, however, that a forfeiture of personal property encumbered by a bona fide security interest or real property encumbered by a bona fide mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance of record shall be subject to the interest of the secured party or subject to the interest of the holder of the mortgage deed of trust, lien of encumbrance of record if such secured party or holder neither had knowledge of or consented to the act or omission. (2)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by law enforcement officers upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property.  Seizure without process may be made if: (a)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or an inspection under a lawful administrative inspection; (b)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this section. (3)  When any property is seized pursuant to this section, proceedings under this section shall be instituted promptly. (4)  (a)  A petition for forfeiture shall be filed promptly in the name of the State of Mississippi with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the seizure is made.  A copy of such petition shall be served upon the following persons by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases: (i)  The owner of the property, if address is known; (ii)  Any secured party who has registered his lien or filed a financing statement as provided by law, if the identity of such secured party can be ascertained by the state by making a good faith effort to ascertain the identity of such secured party as described in paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) of this subsection; (iii)  Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest of whom the state has actual knowledge; (iv)  A holder of a mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance of record, if the property is real estate by making a good faith inquiry as described in paragraph (g) of this section; and (v)  Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized. (b)  If the property is a motor vehicle susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle has been titled, the state shall make inquiry of the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue as to what the records of the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest which affects the vehicle. (c)  If the property is a motor vehicle and is not titled in the State of Mississippi, then the state shall attempt to ascertain the name and address of the person in whose name the vehicle is licensed, and if the vehicle is licensed in a state which has in effect a certificate of title law, the state shall make inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state as to what the records of the agency show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest, or other instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the vehicle. (d)  If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is required by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security interest affecting the property and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that a financing statement covering the security interest has been filed under the laws of this state, the state shall make inquiry of the appropriate office designated in Section 75-9-501 as to what the records show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, has filed a financing statement affecting the property. (e)  If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the state shall make inquiry of the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration as to what the records of the administrator show as to who is the record owner of the property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the property. (f)  In the case of all other personal property subject to forfeiture, if there is any reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security device affects the property, then the state shall make a good faith inquiry to identify the holder of any such instrument. (g)  If the property is real estate, the state shall make inquiry at the appropriate places to determine who is the owner of record and who, if anyone is a holder of a bona fide mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance. (h)  In the event the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when it was seized, or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage or deed of trust which affects the property, the state shall cause any record owner and also any lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, or holder of an encumbrance, mortgage or deed of trust which affects the property to be named in the petition of forfeiture and to be served with process in the same manner as in civil cases. (i)  If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a copy of the petition of forfeiture, or if no person was in possession of the property subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the property is unknown, the state shall file with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to "the Unknown Owner of _______________," filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed description of the property subject to forfeiture.  Service by publication shall contain the other requisites prescribed in Section 11-33-41, and shall be served as provided in Section 11-33-37 for publication of notice for attachments at law. (j)  No proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of this article shall proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section has been complied with.  Any answer received from an inquiry required by paragraphs (b) through (g) of this section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing. (5)  (a)  An owner of property that has been seized shall file a verified answer within twenty (20) days after the completion of service of process.  If no answer is filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the property to the state.  If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty (30) days of filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court if court would not be in progress within thirty (30) days after filing the answer.  Provided, however, that upon request by the state or the owner of the property, the court may postpone said forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending against said owner. (b)  If the owner of the property has filed a verified answer denying that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the state to prove that the property is subject to forfeiture.  The burden of proof placed upon the state shall be clear and convincing proof.  However, if no answer has been filed by the owner of the property, the petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and is prima facie evidence that the property is subject to forfeiture. (c)  At the hearing any claimant of any right, title, or interest in the property may prove his lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage or deed of trust to be bona fide and created without knowledge or consent that the property was to be used so as to cause the property to be subject to forfeiture. (d)  If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the judge shall forfeit the property to the state.  However, if proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party, other person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest or any holder of a bona fide encumbrance, mortgage or deed of trust is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall order the property released to him.  If such interest is less than the present value of the property and if the proof shows that the property is subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the property forfeited to the state. (6)  (a)  All personal property, including money, which is forfeited to the state and is not capable of being sold at public auction shall be liquidated and the proceeds, after deduction of all storage and court costs, shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited in the General Fund of the state. (b)  All real estate which is forfeited to the state shall be sold to the highest bidder at a public auction to be conducted by the state at such place, on such notice and in accordance with the same procedure, as far as practicable, as is required in the case of sales of land under execution of law.  The proceeds of such sale shall first be applied to the cost and expense in administering and conducting such sale, then to the satisfaction of all mortgages, deeds of trusts, liens and encumbrances of record on such property.  All proceeds in excess of the amount necessary for the cost of the sale of such land and the satisfaction of any liens thereon shall be deposited in the General Fund of the State Treasury. (c)  All other property that has been seized by the state and that has been forfeited shall, except as otherwise provided, be sold at a public auction for cash by the state to the highest and best bidder after advertising the sale for at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last notice to appear not more than ten (10) days nor less than five (5) days prior to such sale, in a newspaper having a general circulation throughout the State of Mississippi.  Such notices shall contain a description of the property to be sold and a statement of the time and place of sale.  It shall not be necessary to the validity of such sale either to have the property present at the place of sale or to have the name of the owner thereof stated in such notice.  The proceeds of the sale shall be delivered to the circuit clerk and shall be disposed of as follows: (i)  To any bona fide lienholder, secured party, or other party holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and (ii)  The balance, if any, after deduction of all storage and court costs, shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer and deposited with and used as general funds of the state. (d)  The * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall issue a certificate of title to any person who purchases property under the provisions of this section when a certificate of title is required under the laws of this state. SECTION 25.  Section 97-21-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-21-101.  (1)  All property, real or personal, including money, used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of Section 97-21-53, 97-21-55, 97-21-57 or 97-23-89 is subject to civil forfeiture to the state pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-21-103; provided, however, that a forfeiture of personal property encumbered by a bona fide security interest or real property encumbered by a bona fide mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance of record shall be subject to the interest of the secured party or subject to the interest of the holder of the mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance of record if such secured party or holder neither had knowledge of or consented to the act or omission. (2)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by law enforcement officers upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property.  Seizure without process may be made if: (a)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or an inspection under a lawful administrative inspection; (b)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this article. (3)  The Attorney General, any district attorney or any state agency having jurisdiction over conduct in violation of Section 97-21-53, 97-21-55, 97-21-57 or 97-23-89 may institute civil proceedings under this section.  In any action brought under this section, the circuit court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination.  Pending final determination, the circuit court may at any time enter such injunctions or restraining orders, or take such actions, including the acceptance of satisfactory performance bonds, as the court may deem proper. (4)  Any aggrieved person may institute a civil proceeding against any person or enterprise convicted of engaging in activity in violation of Section 97-21-53, 97-21-55, 97-21-57 or 97-23-89. In such proceeding, relief shall be granted in conformity with the principles that govern the granting of injunctive relief from threatened loss or damage in other civil cases, except that no showing of immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage to the person shall have to be made. (5)  The Attorney General may, upon timely application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under this section if he certifies that, in his opinion, the action or proceeding is of general public importance.  In such action or proceeding, the state shall be entitled to the same relief as if the Attorney General instituted the action or proceeding. (6)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a criminal or civil action or proceeding under this article may be commenced at any time within five (5) years after the conduct in violation of law terminates or the cause of action accrues.  If a criminal prosecution or civil action or other proceeding is brought, or intervened in, to punish, prevent or restrain any violation of law, the running of the period of limitations prescribed by this section with respect to any cause of action arising under this section which is based, in whole or in part, upon any matter complained of in any such prosecution, action or proceeding shall be suspended during the pendency of such prosecution, action or proceeding and for two (2) years following its termination. (7)  The application of one (1) civil remedy under any provision of this article shall not preclude the application of any other remedy, civil or criminal, under this article or any other provision of law.  Civil remedies under this article are supplemental. SECTION 26.  Section 97-37-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-37-23.  (1)  Except for persons who are engaged in lawful business activities or persons who are engaged in educational activities conducted by educational institutions, it is unlawful for any person to have in his possession: (a)  Dynamite caps, nitroglycerine caps, fuses, detonators, dynamite, nitroglycerine, explosives, gas or stink bombs, or other similar explosives peculiarly possessed and adapted to aid in the commission of a crime; except such person or persons who are engaged in a lawful business which ordinarily requires the use thereof in the ordinary and usual conduct of such business, and who possess said articles for the purpose of use in said business; (b)  Any: (i)  Bomb; (ii)  Grenade; (iii)  Rocket having a propellant charge of more than four (4) ounces; (iv)  Missile having an explosive or incendiary charge of more than one-quarter (1/4) ounce; (v)  Mine; (vi)  Any combination of parts either designed or intended for use in converting any device into one or more of the destructive devices described in this paragraph (b); or (vii)  Any device which consists of or includes a breakable container including a flammable liquid or compound and a wick composed of any material which, when ignited, is capable of igniting such flammable liquid or compound and can be carried or thrown by one (1) individual acting alone; and (viii)  Or other similar explosives peculiarly possessed and adapted to aid in the commission of a crime; and (c)  Upon conviction of any person thereof, he shall be punished by imprisonment in the Penitentiary for a term not to exceed five (5) years.  The possession of such explosives by one who does not customarily use same in his regular and ordinary occupational activities shall be prima facie evidence of an intention to use same for such unlawful purposes. (2)  It shall be the duty of any sheriff, constable, marshal, or policeman in a municipality, or any person vested with general police authority, who has reason to believe and does believe that the above-described explosives are being transported or possessed for aid in the commission of a crime, forthwith to make a reasonable search of such person or vehicle, and to seize such explosives and to at once arrest the person or persons having possession or control thereof.  Such officer or officers proceeding in good faith shall not be liable either civilly or criminally for such a search and seizure without a warrant, so long as said search and seizure is conducted in a reasonable manner, it appearing that the officer or officers had reason to believe and did believe that the law was being violated at the time such search was instituted.  And the officer or officers making such search shall be competent to testify as a witness or witnesses as to all facts ascertained by means of said reasonable search or seizure, and all such explosives seized shall be admitted in evidence.  But this section shall not authorize the search of a residence or home, or room, or building, or the premises belonging to or in the possession lawfully of the party suspected, without a search warrant executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (3)  In order to invoke the exception provided in subsection (1) for persons who possess explosive articles for business purposes, such person must comply with the provisions of this subsection as follows: (a)  One or more individuals shall be designated by the owner of a business employing explosive articles subject to this section as the custodian for such articles; and (b)  The custodian shall notify the sheriff of any county wherein such articles are utilized or employed by registering with the sheriff in writing prior to such use and including in such registration: (i)  The business name and address of the owner of the articles; (ii)  The name, address and local address of the custodian; (iii)  The location of the job site where such articles shall be employed; (iv)  In the event subject articles will not be in the immediate possession of the custodian, the custodian shall advise the sheriff of the specific location where such articles are left or stored; (v)  Whenever business operations subject to this section or the storage of articles subject to this section occur within an incorporated municipality, the mayor or chief of police shall also be notified as required by this subsection. (4)  Any person who fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary for a term not to exceed one (1) year or by a fine in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both. (5)  The provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section are supplemental to any other statutory provision, ordinances of local governments or liabilities or duties otherwise imposed by law. SECTION 27.  Section 97-43-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-43-9.  (1)  Any circuit court may, after making due provision for the rights of innocent persons, enjoin violations of the provisions of this chapter by issuing appropriate orders and judgments, including, but not limited to: (a)  Ordering any defendant to divest himself of any interest in any enterprise, including real property. (b)  Imposing reasonable restrictions upon the future activities or investments of any defendant, including, but not limited to, prohibiting any defendant from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise in which he was engaged in violation of the provisions of this chapter. (c)  Ordering the dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise. (d)  Ordering the suspension or revocation of a license or permit granted to any enterprise by any agency of the state. (e)  Ordering the forfeiture of the charter of a corporation organized under the laws of the state, or the revocation of a certificate authorizing a foreign corporation to conduct business within the state, upon finding that the board of directors or a managerial agent acting on behalf of the corporation, in conducting the affairs of the corporation, has authorized or engaged in conduct in violation of this chapter and that, for the prevention of future criminal activity, the public interest requires the charter of the corporation forfeited and the corporation dissolved or the certificate revoked. (2)  All property, real or personal, including money, used in the course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through, conduct in violation of a provision of this chapter is subject to civil forfeiture to the state pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-43-11; provided, however, that a forfeiture of personal property encumbered by a bona fide security interest or real property encumbered by a bona fide mortgage, deed of trust, lien or encumbrance of record shall be subject to the interest of the secured party or subject to the interest of the holder of the mortgage, deed of trust, lien * * *of or encumbrance of record if such secured party or holder neither had knowledge of or consented to the act or omission. (3)  Property subject to forfeiture may be seized by law enforcement officers upon process issued by any appropriate court having jurisdiction over the property.  Seizure without process may be made if: (a)  The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or an inspection under a lawful administrative inspection; (b)  The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this article * * *;. (4)  The Attorney General, any district attorney or any state agency having jurisdiction over conduct in violation of a provision of this chapter may institute civil proceedings under this section.  In any action brought under this section, the circuit court shall proceed as soon as practicable to the hearing and determination.  Pending final determination, the circuit court may at any time enter such injunctions or restraining orders, or take such actions, including the acceptance of satisfactory performance bonds, as the court may deem proper. (5)  Any aggrieved person may institute a civil proceeding under subsection (1) of this section against any person or enterprise convicted of engaging in activity in violation of this chapter.  In such proceeding, relief shall be granted in conformity with the principles that govern the granting of injunctive relief from threatened loss or damage in other civil cases, except that no showing of immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage to the person shall have to be made. (6)  Any person who is injured by reason of any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall have a cause of action against any person or enterprise convicted of engaging in activity in violation of this chapter for threefold the actual damages sustained and, when appropriate, punitive damages.  Such person shall also recover attorney's * * *' fees in the trial and appellate courts and costs of investigation and litigation, reasonably incurred. (a)  The defendant or any injured person may demand a trial by jury in any civil action brought pursuant to this subsection. (b)  Any injured person shall have a right or claim to forfeited property or to the proceeds derived therefrom superior to any right or claim the state has in the same property or proceeds. (7)  The Attorney General may, upon timely application, intervene in any civil action or proceeding brought under subsections (5) or (6) of this section if he certifies that, in his opinion, the action or proceeding is of general public importance.  In such action or proceeding, the state shall be entitled to the same relief as if the Attorney General instituted the action or proceeding. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a criminal or civil action or proceeding under this chapter may be commenced at any time within five (5) years after the conduct in violation of a provision of this chapter terminates or the cause of action accrues.  If a criminal prosecution or civil action or other proceeding is brought, or intervened in, to punish, prevent or restrain any violation of the provisions of this chapter, the running of the period of limitations prescribed by this section with respect to any cause of action arising under subsections (5) or (6) of this section which is based, in whole or in part, upon any matter complained of in any such prosecution, action or proceeding shall be suspended during the pendency of such prosecution, action or proceeding and for two (2) years following its termination. (9)  The application of one (1) civil remedy under any provision of this chapter shall not preclude the application of any other remedy, civil or criminal, under this chapter or any other provision of law.  Civil remedies under this chapter are supplemental. SECTION 28.  Section 99-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-2.  Any United States Marshal or Deputy United States Marshal is authorized in the performance of his duties to bear arms, to make arrests and to make searches and seizures in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  Whenever any other federal law enforcement officer who is employed by the United States government, authorized to effect an arrest for a violation of the United States Code, and authorized to carry a firearm in the performance of his duties is working in cooperation with local law enforcement officers, the agent shall have the authority in the performance of his duties to bear arms, to make arrests and to make searches and seizures.  Any right granted under this section in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and search warrant from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state. SECTION 29.  Section 99-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-15-11.  Any conservator of the peace, on the affidavit of a credible person, may issue a search warrant and cause stolen or embezzled goods to be seized; but the affidavit and warrant must specify the goods to be seized and the person or place to be searched and be in compliance with the requirements of Section 1 of this act. SECTION 30.  Section 99-27-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-27-15.  Upon the affidavit of any credible person that he or she has reason to believe and does believe:  (1) that intoxicating liquor is being stored, kept, owned, controlled, or possessed, in violation of the laws of the state, at any designated place or within any designated receptacle, which place is to be stated in the affidavit; or (2) that intoxicating liquor is being sold or offered for sale contrary to law at any designated place; or (3) that liquor is being manufactured or distilled, or attempted to be manufactured or distilled at any designated place, in violation of the laws of the state; or (4) that intoxicating liquor is being transported, attempted to be transported within the state at or over or through any designated place, contrary to the laws of the state, it shall be the duty of any justice of the peace of the county or county judge, or the judge of the circuit court of the district or the chancellor of the district in which the place is situated, to issue a search warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, directed to the sheriff or any constable of the county, or if in a municipality, to the sheriff or any constable or marshal or policeman therein, commanding him or her to proceed in the day or nighttime, to enter by breaking if necessary, and to diligently search any building, room in a building, outhouses, place, wagon, cart, buggy, automobile, motorcycle, motor truck, water or air craft or other vehicle, as may be designated in the affidavit, and to seize said intoxicating liquor, and any wagon, buggy, cart, automobile, motorcycle, motor truck, water or air craft or other vehicle used or attempted to be used in the transporting of the same, or any still or distillery or integral part of the same including appliances, vessels and equipment pertaining thereto used in making or manufacturing or attempting to make or manufacture said intoxicating liquor, and to hold the same until disposed of by law, and to arrest the person, or persons in possession and control of the same. The writ shall be returnable instanter or on a day stated and a copy shall be served on the owner or person in possession if such person be present or readily found. SECTION 31.  Section 99-27-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-27-21.  It shall be the duty of any sheriff or constable of a county, or any sheriff, constable or marshal, or policeman in a municipality who has reason to believe and does believe that intoxicating liquor is being transported in violation of law, in any wagon, cart, buggy, automobile, motorcycle, motor truck, water or air craft, or any other vehicle, forthwith to make a reasonable search of such vehicle and to seize any intoxicating liquor so found being transported or being attempted to be transported in violation of law and at once to arrest the person or persons in possession or control thereof and transporting or attempting to transport same in violation of law; and such officer or officers proceeding in good faith shall not be liable either civilly or criminally for such a search and seizure without a warrant, so long as said search and seizure is conducted in a reasonable manner and in compliance with Section 1 of this act, it appearing that the officer or officers had reason to believe and did believe that the prohibition laws of the State of Mississippi were being violated at the time such search was instituted.  And the officers making such search shall be a competent witness, or witnesses, to testify as to all facts ascertained, and discoveries made, by means of said reasonable search, and all liquor, and all appliances for its manufacture or transportation, so seized shall be admitted in evidence.  But this section shall not authorize the search of a residence or home or room or building or the premises belonging to or in the possession lawfully of the party suspected, without a search warrant. SECTION 32.  Section 11-43-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 11-43-25.  Whenever the judge or chancellor, on issuing a writ of habeas corpus, shall be satisfied, by affidavit or otherwise, that the person unlawfully depriving another of his or her liberty has committed a crime in connection with such unlawful act, he or she may embody in the writ a warrant for the arrest of such person and have him or her brought up for examination at the hearing of the habeas corpus in compliance with Section 1 of this act; and being satisfied, on the trial and examination, of the guilt of such person, the judge or chancellor shall commit him or her, or order his or her release on bail, to appear before the proper court to answer the charge. SECTION 33.  Section 19-25-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-25-11.  In the event there is outstanding a warrant for the arrest of the sheriff of the county issued by any justice of the peace, mayor, or any police justice in said county whereby the said sheriff has been charged by affidavit duly made before said justice of the peace, mayor, or police justice in said county for any misdemeanor or felony, any constable of the county, or any marshal or police officer of any municipality located in said county, may execute said warrant and arrest the said sheriff in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  In his or her failure to make bond in the amount as fixed by the justice of the peace, mayor or police justice where said affidavit was made, the officer making the arrest may confine said sheriff in a county jail adjoining the county of his or her residence, or in any other county jail in the state, and on the date of trial shall deliver him or her up to the court for trial.  Said officer making the arrest shall be the jailer of said county during the confinement of the said sheriff in jail and/or while his or her cause on said criminal charge is pending for trial, provided the sheriff was jailer and living in the jail at the time of his or her arrest. SECTION 34.  Section 23-15-941, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-941.  If upon the hearing of a primary election contest or complaint, under Section 23-15-931, it shall distinctly appear to the trial judge that any person, including a candidate or election officer, has willfully and corruptly violated any primary election statute and such violation is by said statute made a criminal offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, it shall be the duty of the trial judge to issue immediately his warrant for the arrest of the guilty party in compliance with Section 1 of this act, reciting in his order therefor, in brief, the grounds or causes for the arrest.  Such warrant and a certified copy of the order shall be forthwith placed in the hands of the sheriff of the county wherein the offense occurred, and the sheriff shall at once, upon receipt of the warrant, arrest the party and commit him to prison, unless and until the party give bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) or more good and sufficient sureties conditioned for his appearance at the next term of the circuit court and from term to term until discharged by law.  When the arrest has been made and the bond, if any, given, the sheriff shall deliver all the papers therein with his return thereon to the circuit clerk who shall file, and thereafter personally deliver, the same to the foreman of the next grand jury. SECTION 35.  Section 27-7-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-79.  (1)  The commissioner shall have exclusive jurisdiction and be charged with the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article, except as otherwise provided. (2)  The commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of any return, or for the purpose of making a return where none has been made, is hereby authorized, by any agent designated by the commissioner for that purpose, to examine any books, papers, records or memoranda, bearing upon the matter required to be included in the return, and may require the attendance of persons rendering a return or of any officer or employee of such person, or of any person having knowledge in the premises, and may take his testimony with reference to the matter required by law to be included in the return, with power to administer oaths to such person or persons. (3)  If any person summoned to appear under this article to testify, or produce books, papers or other data, shall refuse to do so, the chancery court for the district in which the person resides shall have jurisdiction by appropriate process to compel such attendance, testimony or production of books, papers or other data. (4)  The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may appoint and remove such officers, agents, deputies, clerks and employees as he may deem necessary, such persons to have such duties and powers as the commissioner may, from time to time, prescribe. The salaries of all officers, agents and employees employed by the commissioner shall be such as he may prescribe, with the approval of the Governor, not to exceed such amounts as may be appropriated by the Legislature, and the members of the commission and such officers, agents and employees shall be allowed such reasonable and necessary traveling and other expenses as may be incurred in the performance of their duties, not to exceed the amount appropriated therefor by the Legislature. (5)  The commissioner shall designate certain special agents appointed under this section and evidenced by a written certificate of appointment under the seal of the commission, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state.  Such agents, when in possession of a warrant issued under authority of this article, shall have all the powers and duties of the sheriff in enforcing the provisions of the article relating to the warrant thus issued, and in making arrests of persons obstructing or seeking to obstruct the execution of the warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, or in serving any writ, notice or order connected with the enrolled judgment for which the warrant is issued by whatever officer or authority of court issued. (6)  The commissioner may require such of the officers, agents, and employees, as he may designate, to give bond for the faithful performance of their duties, in such form and with such securities as he may determine, and all premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the commissioner out of the monies appropriated for the purposes of this article. (7)  All officers empowered by law to administer oaths and the members of the commission, and such officers as it may designate, shall have power to administer an oath to any person or to take the acknowledgment of any person in respect to any return or report required by this article or the rules and regulations of the commissioner. (8)  All agents of the commissioner shall have, for identification purposes, proper credentials signed by the chairman of the commission. (9)  The commissioner shall prepare and publish annually statistics reasonably available with respect to the operation of this law, including classification of taxpayers and of the income, the amounts allowed as deductions, exemptions and credits, and also a statement of the cost of administering this article and any other facts deemed pertinent and valuable. SECTION 36.  Section 27-13-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-13-65.  (1)  Jurisdiction. The commissioner shall have exclusive jurisdiction and be charged with the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided. (2)  Examine books. The commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining the correctness of any return, or for the purpose of making a return where none has been made, is hereby authorized, by any agent designated by the commissioner, for that purpose, to examine any books, papers, records or memoranda, bearing upon the matter required to be included in the return, and may require the attendance of persons rendering a return or of any officer or employee of such person, or of any person having knowledge in the premises, and may take his testimony with reference to the matter required by law to be included in such return, with power to administer oaths to such person or persons. (3)  Summons.  If any person summoned to appear under this chapter to testify, or produce books, papers or other data, shall refuse to do so, the chancery court for the district in which such person resides shall have jurisdiction by appropriate process to compel attendance, testimony or production of books, papers or other data. (4)  Employees.  The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may appoint and remove such officers, agents, deputies, clerks and employees as he may deem necessary, such persons to have such duties and powers as the commissioner may, from time to time, prescribe.  The salaries of all officers, agents and employees employed by the commissioner shall be such as he may prescribe, with the approval of the Governor, not to exceed such amounts as may be appropriated by the Legislature, and the members of the commission and such officers, agents and employees shall be allowed such reasonable and necessary traveling and other expenses as may be incurred in the performance of their duties not to exceed the amount appropriated therefor by the Legislature. (5)  Special agents. The commissioner shall designate certain special agents appointed under this section and evidenced by a written certificate of appointment under the seal of the commission, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state.  Such agents, when in possession of a warrant issued under authority of this chapter and in compliance with Section 1 of this act, shall have all the powers and duties of the sheriff in enforcing the provisions of the chapter relating to the warrant thus issued, and in making arrests of persons obstructing or seeking to obstruct the execution of such warrant, or in serving any writ, notice or order connected with the enrolled judgment for which the warrant is issued by whatever officer or authority of court issued. (6)  Employees bond. The commissioner may require such of the officers, agents and employees, as he may designate, to give bond for the faithful performance of their duties, in such form and with such securities as he may determine, and all premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the commissioner out of the monies appropriated for the purposes of this chapter. (7)  Administer oath. All officers empowered by law to administer oaths and the members of the commission, and such officers as it may designate, shall have power to administer an oath to any person or to take the acknowledgment of any person in respect to any return or report required by this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commissioner. (8)  Credentials. All agents of the commissioner shall have, for identification purposes, proper credentials signed by the chairman of the commission. (9)  Statistics.  The commissioner shall prepare and publish annually statistics reasonably available with respect to the operation of this law, as he may deem pertinent and valuable. SECTION 37.  Section 27-19-133, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-133.  Any sheriff, deputy sheriff or municipal law enforcement officer is hereby authorized to arrest, without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, any person operating, or causing to be operated, any motor vehicle contrary to the provisions of this article, within the limits of their respective jurisdiction.  In case the owner, or person or persons operating, or causing to be operated, a motor vehicle shall be taken into custody because of a violation of any provision hereof, he or they may be forthwith taken before an accessible justice court judge, police justice, municipal judge or mayor, having jurisdiction of such offense, and be entitled to an immediate hearing.  If such hearing cannot then be had, he shall be released from custody upon giving a good and sufficient bond to appear and answer for such violation, at such time and place as shall then be designated, in the manner provided by law, or secured by a sum equal to the maximum fine for the offense with which he is charged, or, in lieu thereof, by leaving the motor vehicle being operated by such person with such officer as may have the accused in charge.  Provided, however, that should the person or persons in custody so request, the justice court judge, police justice, municipal judge or mayor before whom the complaint is made, or before whom the person or persons in custody shall be taken, shall adjourn the hearing of said case for ten (10) days upon the execution of a good and sufficient bond, in the manner as above provided, and, if the defendant or defendants fail to appear to defend said case, the sum or sums so deposited, or bond so given, shall be forfeited to the state and disposed of as bond given and money deposited for bail in other cases, or the motor vehicle which may have been left by said person or persons may be sold at public auction by order of the justice court judge, police justice, municipal judge or mayor, after giving notice of said proposed sale for three (3) consecutive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the arrest is made, if there be such newspaper in said county, describing accurately the motor vehicle therein and giving the date of the proposed sale.  From the amount realized from such sale a sum equal to the maximum fine for the offense charged shall be disposed of in like manner; and the surplus, if any, after deducting all expenses incurred in keeping or sale of such vehicle, shall be returned to such owner on demand, but no such forfeiture and disposition of such security shall in anywise impair the jurisdiction of the justice court judge, police justice, municipal judge or mayor, to hear and determine any such charge made against the owner of such motor vehicle, or the person or persons operating, or causing to be operated, the said vehicle, or to inflict, upon conviction, any punishment prescribed by this article.  If there be no such newspaper published in said county, then such sale shall be advertised by posting written notice in two (2) or more public places in said county for three (3) consecutive weeks next preceding such sale. Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer or other peace officer, who shall arrest or prefer charges against any person alleged to have operated a motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of this article shall, within five (5) days after the termination of such proceedings, forward to the commission a transcript of the court proceedings on such charges, which transcript shall show the name of the defendant, the date of the offense, the nature of the offense, the court in which the proceedings were had, the disposition of the matter and the sentence, if any, imposed by the court.  Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer or other peace officer, who shall fail or refuse to forward such transcript as required hereby, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. In addition thereto, any sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal law enforcement officer or other peace officer who shall fail or refuse to forward such transcript to the commission shall be liable on his official bond for a civil penalty of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), which may be recovered upon appropriate proceedings brought by the commission in chancery court of the proper county. SECTION 38.  Section 27-19-135, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-135.  All taxes, costs and penalties imposed by this article shall constitute a first lien on all motor vehicles operated in violation of the provisions hereof, which lien shall be paramount to any and all private liens, and any such motor vehicle shall be subject to being seized and impounded to enforce collection thereof.  Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or representative or employee of the * * *Mississippi State Tax Commission Department of Revenue or Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be authorized to arrest, without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, any person operating or driving any motor vehicle contrary to the provisions of this article, within the limits of their respective jurisdictions, and/or to seize and impound any motor vehicle being operated in violation of the provisions hereof.  In case of such arrest or seizure, such arresting or impounding officer shall immediately go into some court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the lien thereon. SECTION 39.  Section 27-19-136, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-136.  (1)  In addition to any other remedy provided in this article, the Commissioner of Revenue or his designated officers or agents, or the Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or his designated officers or agents are authorized to assess taxes and/or fines and penalties as provided by this article, notice of which assessment shall be delivered to the owner or operator or his agent at the time of assessment, by mail or personal delivery, to be collected as hereinafter provided in this section. (2)  In lieu of seizure and impoundment of vehicles as provided by Section 27-19-135, the Commissioner of Revenue or Executive Director of the Department of Transportation may, in their discretion, authorize any owner or operator of a motor vehicle found to be operated in violation of the provisions of this article to execute and file with the Department of Revenue or Executive Director of the Department of Transportation a good and valid bond written by a surety company authorized to do business in this state in an amount equal to the taxes and/or fines and penalties assessed because of such violation conditioned upon the prompt payment when due of all such taxes and/or fines and penalties.  If the Commissioner of Revenue or Executive Director of the Department of Transportation is satisfied that such owner or operator has property located in this state of value in excess of the amount of said taxes and/or fines and penalties, it may waive the bond requirement. (3)  If the Commissioner of Revenue or Executive Director of the Department of Transportation shall elect to assess taxes and/or fines and penalties imposed by this article under provisions of this section, it may authorize such terms for payment as shall be deemed appropriate over a period of time not to exceed six (6) months.  Notice of such terms shall be given to the owner or operator by mail or personal delivery. (4)  If the person thus assessed or liable for the payment of taxes and/or fines and penalties imposed by this article shall fail or refuse to make payment when due, the Commissioner of Revenue or Executive Director of the Department of Transportation may file notice of tax liens and issue warrants in the same manner and with the same effect as liens and warrants are issued and executed upon under the provisions of Sections 27-65-57 through 27-65-69. (5)  The authority granted to special agents in Section 27-65-91 shall also apply with the same force and effect in the execution of warrants and orders issued under the provisions of this article and in compliance with Section 1 of this act and in making arrests of persons obstructing or seeking to obstruct the execution of such warrants or in serving any writ, notice or order connected with the enrolled judgment for which the warrant is issued under the provisions of this article. (6)  The Executive Director of the Department of Transportation shall designate certain officers or agents by written certificate of appointment under seal of the Department of Transportation, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state.  Such officers or agents, when in possession of a warrant issued under authority of this article, shall have all the powers and duties of the sheriff in the enforcement and execution of warrants and orders issued under the provisions of this article and in compliance with Section 1 of this act and in making arrests of persons obstructing or seeking to obstruct the execution of such warrants, or in serving any writ, notice or order connected with the enrolled judgment for which the warrant is issued under the provisions of this article. (7)  All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes, and for other noncompliance with the provisions of said chapter, and all other requirements and duties imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for taxes under the provisions of this article, and the department shall exercise all power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this article as are provided in said Sales Tax Law, except that in cases of conflict, then the provisions of this article shall control. SECTION 40.  Section 27-65-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-91.  The commissioner shall designate certain special agents appointed hereunder and evidenced by a written certificate of appointment under the seal of the * * * tax commission Department of Revenue, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state.  Such agents, when in possession of a warrant issued under authority of this chapter and in compliance with Section 1 of this act, shall have all the powers and duties of the sheriff in enforcing the provisions of the chapter relating to the warrant thus issued, and in making arrests of persons obstructing or seeking to obstruct the execution of such warrant, or in serving any writ, notice or order connected with the enrolled judgment for which the warrant is issued by whatever officer or authority of court issued. SECTION 41.  Section 33-13-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-13-21.  (1)  Arrest is the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing him to remain within specified limits.  Confinement is the physical restraint of a person. (2)  An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code or through any person authorized by this code to apprehend persons.  A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of his company or subject to his authority into arrest or confinement. (3)  A commissioned officer or warrant officer may be ordered into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority he is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer.  The authority to order such persons into arrest or confinement may not be delegated. (4)  No person may be ordered into arrest or confinement except for probable cause. (5)  This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until a proper authority may be notified. (6)  All arrests shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 42.  Section 33-13-321, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-13-321.  (1)  The trial counsel, the defense counsel, the accused, if not represented by counsel, and the court-martial shall have equal opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence.  Each shall have the right of compulsory process for obtaining witnesses. (2)  The military judge or summary court officer of a court-martial may: (a)  Issue a warrant for the arrest of any accused person in compliance with Section 1 of this act who having been served with a warrant and a copy of the charges, disobeys a written order by the convening authority to appear before the court; (b)  Issue a subpoena duces tecum and other subpoenas; (c)  Enforce by attachment the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers; and (d)  Sentence for refusal to be sworn or to answer, as provided in actions before civil courts of the state. (3)  Process issued in court-martial cases to compel witnesses to appear and testify and to compel the production of other evidence shall run to any part of the state and shall be executed by civil officers or peace officers as prescribed by the laws of the state. SECTION 43.  Section 33-13-615, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-13-615.  (1)  Military courts may issue any process or mandate necessary to carry into effect their powers.  Such a court may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum and enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and production of books and records, when it is sitting within the state and the witnesses, books and records sought are also so located. (2)  Process and mandates may be issued by summary courts-martial, provost courts, military judges, or the president of other military courts and may be directed to and may be executed by the marshals of the military court or any peace officer and shall be in such form as may be prescribed by regulations issued under this code. (3)  All officers to whom process or mandates may be directed shall execute them and make return of their acts thereunder according to the requirements of those documents.  Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, no such officer may demand or require payment of any fee or charge for receiving, executing, or returning such a process or mandate or for any service in connection therewith. (4)  The president of any court-martial, any military judge and any summary court officer, shall have authority to issue, under his hand, in the name of the State of Mississippi, directed to any sheriff or constable, whose duty it shall be to serve or execute the same in the same manner in which like process is served or executed when issued by a magistrate, all necessary process, subpoenas, attachments, warrants of arrest in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and warrants of commitment. SECTION 44.  Section 33-13-623, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-13-623.  (1)  When charges against any person in the military service of this state are made or referred to a convening authority authorized to convene a court-martial for the trial of such person, and a convening authority, believing that such charges can be sustained, and has reason to believe that the person so charged will not appear for trial, or intends to flee from justice, a convening authority may issue a warrant of arrest to the sheriff or any constable of the county in which the person charged resides, or wherein he is supposed to be, commanding the sheriff or constable to take the body of the person so charged and confine him in jail until such time as his case may be finally disposed of; and the sheriff or constable, on the order of the convening authority, shall bring the person so charged before the court-martial for trial, or turn him over to whomever the order may direct, the convening authority issuing the warrant of arrest, shall endorse thereon the amount of bail to be required; and it shall be a violation of duty on the part of any sheriff or constable to permit a person so committed to remain out of jail, except that he may, when such person desires it, permit him to give bail in the sum endorsed on the warrant, conditioned for his appearance, from time to time, before such court-martial as he may be ordered for trial, and until his case is finally disposed of, or until such time as he may surrender to the sheriff or constable as directed by the convening authority of the court-martial before which he may be ordered for trial. (2)  Upon the failure of any person, who has been admitted to bail conditioned for his appearance for trial before a court-martial, or upon failure of any person admitted to bail to appear as a witness in any case before a court-martial, as conditioned in the bail bond of any such person, the court-martial shall certify the fact of such failure to so appear to the convening authority or to the officer commanding for the time being, as the case may be; and such officer shall cause a judge advocate, district or county attorney to file suit therefor. (3)  The rules laid down in the criminal procedural statutes of this state relating to the giving of bail, the amount of bail, the number of sureties, the persons who may be sureties, the property exempt from liability, the responsibility of parties to the same and all other rules of a general nature not inconsistent with this law are applicable to bail taken as provided in this code. (4)  A warrant of arrest issued by a convening authority to order a court-martial, and all subpoenas and other process issued by courts-martial and courts of inquiry shall extend to every part of the state and shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (5)  When any lawful process, issued by the proper officer of any court-martial, comes to the hands of any sheriff or constable, he shall perform the usual duties of such officer and perform all acts and duties by this code imposed or authorized to be performed by any sheriff or constable.  Failure of any sheriff or constable to perform the duties required by this code shall be misdemeanor offenses punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and by confinement of not less than six (6) months and not more than twelve (12) months in jail. SECTION 45.  Section 33-15-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-15-41.  Any emergency management auxiliary policeman who has had conferred upon him the power of a peace officer, as provided in Section 33-15-39 and when in full and distinctive uniform or displaying a badge or other insignia of authority, may arrest without a warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act any person violating or attempting to violate in such officer's presence any order, rule * * *, or regulation made pursuant to this article. This authority shall be limited to those rules and regulations which affect the public generally. SECTION 46.  Section 41-21-93, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-21-93.  If any such patient admitted or committed by a court to a treatment facility leaves without authorization, the director may immediately issue a warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act to any officer authorized to make arrests, commanding the arrest and return of said patient to the hospital from which he is departed. SECTION 47.  Section 43-21-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-21-301.  (1)  No court other than the youth court shall issue an arrest warrant or custody order for a child in a matter in which the youth court has exclusive original jurisdiction but shall refer the matter to the youth court.  Any arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (2)  Except as otherwise provided, no child in a matter in which the youth court has exclusive original jurisdiction shall be taken into custody by a law enforcement officer, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other person unless the judge or his designee has issued a custody order to take the child into custody. (3)  The judge or his designee may require a law enforcement officer, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any suitable person to take a child into custody for a period not longer than forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and statutory state holidays. (a)  Custody orders under this subsection may be issued if it appears that there is probable cause to believe that: (i)  The child is within the jurisdiction of the court; (ii)  Custody is necessary because of any of the following reasons:  the child is in danger of a significant risk of harm, any person would be in danger of a significant risk of harm by the child, to ensure the child's attendance in court at such time as required, or a parent, guardian or custodian is not available to provide for the care and supervision of the child; and (iii)  There is no reasonable alternative to custody. A finding of probable cause under this subsection (3)(a) shall not be based solely upon a positive drug test of a newborn or parent for marijuana or solely upon the status of a parent as a cardholder under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act; however, a finding of probable cause may be based upon an evidence-based finding of harm to the child or a parent's inability to provide for the care and supervision of the child due to the parent's use of marijuana.  Probable cause for unlawful use of any controlled substance, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3)(a) for marijuana, may be based:  1. upon a parent's positive drug test for unlawful use of a controlled substance only if the child is in danger of a significant risk of harm or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; and 2. upon a newborn's positive drug screen for a controlled substance that was used unlawfully only if the child is in danger of a significant risk of harm or the parent is unable to provide proper care or supervision of the child because of the unlawful use and there is no reasonable alternative to custody. A child shall not be considered "neglected" solely because the child's parent, guardian or custodian has failed to provide the child with food, clothing, or shelter necessary to sustain the life or health of the child when the failure is caused primarily by financial inability, unless relief services had been offered and refused and the child is in imminent risk of harm. (b)  Custody orders under this subsection shall be written.  In emergency cases, a judge or his designee may issue an oral custody order, but the order shall be reduced to writing within forty-eight (48) hours of its issuance. (c)  Each youth court judge shall develop and make available to law enforcement a list of designees who are available after hours, on weekends and on holidays. (4)  The judge or his designee may order, orally or in writing, the immediate release of any child in the custody of any person or agency.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, custody orders as provided by this chapter and authorizations of temporary custody may be written or oral, but, if oral, reduced to writing within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and statutory state holidays.  The written order shall: (a)  Specify the name and address of the child, or, if unknown, designate him or her by any name or description by which he or she can be identified with reasonable certainty; (b)  Specify the age of the child, or, if unknown, that he or she is believed to be of an age subject to the jurisdiction of the youth court; (c)  Except in cases where the child is alleged to be a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision, state that the effect of the continuation of the child's residing within his or her own home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, that the placement of the child in foster care is in the best interests of the child, and unless the reasonable efforts requirement is bypassed under Section 43-21-603(7)(c), also state that (i) reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his or her own home, but that the circumstances warrant his removal and there is no reasonable alternative to custody; or (ii) the circumstances are of such an emergency nature that no reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, and that there is no reasonable alternative to custody.  If the court makes a finding in accordance with (ii) of this paragraph, the court shall order that reasonable efforts be made toward the reunification of the child with his or her family; (d)  State that the child shall be brought immediately before the youth court or be taken to a place designated by the order to be held pending review of the order; (e)  State the date issued and the youth court by which the order is issued; and (f)  Be signed by the judge or his designee with the title of his office. (5)  The taking of a child into custody shall not be considered an arrest except for evidentiary purposes. (6)  (a)  No child who has been accused or adjudicated of any offense that would not be a crime if committed by an adult shall be placed in an adult jail or lockup.  An accused status offender shall not be held in secure detention longer than twenty-four (24) hours prior to and twenty-four (24) hours after an initial court appearance, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and statutory state holidays, except under the following circumstances:  a status offender may be held in secure detention for violating a valid court order pursuant to the criteria as established by the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2002, and any subsequent amendments thereto, and out-of-state runaways may be detained pending return to their home state. (b)  No accused or adjudicated juvenile offender, except for an accused or adjudicated juvenile offender in cases where jurisdiction is waived to the adult criminal court, shall be detained or placed into custody of any adult jail or lockup for a period in excess of six (6) hours. (c)  If any county violates the provisions of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the state agency authorized to allocate federal funds received pursuant to the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, 88 Stat. 2750 (codified in scattered Sections of 5, 18, 42 USCS), shall withhold the county's share of such funds. (d)  Any county that does not have a facility in which to detain its juvenile offenders in compliance with the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection may enter into a contractual agreement to detain or place into custody the juvenile offenders of that county with any county or municipality that does have such a facility, or with the State of Mississippi, or with any private entity that maintains a juvenile correctional facility. (e)  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection, all counties shall be allowed a one-year grace period from March 27, 1993, to comply with the provisions of this subsection. SECTION 48.  Section 45-3-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-3-21.  (1)  The powers and duties of the Highway Safety Patrol shall be, in addition to all others prescribed by law, as follows: (a)  To enforce all of the traffic laws, rules and regulations of the State of Mississippi upon all highways of the state highway system and the rights-of-way of such highways; provided, however, that if any person commits an offense upon the state highway system and be pursued by a member of the Highway Safety Patrol, such patrol officer may pursue and apprehend such offender upon any of the highways or public roads of this state, or to any other place to which such offender may flee. (b)  To enforce all rules and regulations of the commissioner promulgated pursuant to legal authority. (c)  When so directed by the Governor, to enforce any of the laws of this state upon any of the highways or public roads thereof. (d)  Upon the request of the Department of Revenue, and with the approval of the Governor, to enforce all of the provisions of law with reference to the registration, license and taxation of vehicles using the highways of this state, and relative to the sizes, weights and load limits of such vehicles, and to enforce the provisions of all other laws administered by the Department of Revenue upon any of the highways or public roads of this state; and for such purpose the Highway Safety Patrol shall have the authority to collect and receive all taxes which may be due under any of such laws, and to report and remit same to the Department of Revenue in the manner required by law, or the rules and regulations of the Department of Revenue. (e)  Upon request of the Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division within the Department of Public Safety, and when so instructed by the commissioner, to enforce the Mississippi Motor Carrier Regulatory Law of 1938 and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. (f)  To arrest without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act any person or persons committing or attempting to commit any misdemeanor, felony or breach of the peace within their presence or view, and to pursue and so arrest any person committing such an offense to and at any place in the State of Mississippi where he may go or be.  Nothing herein shall be construed as granting the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol general police powers. (g)  To aid and assist any law enforcement officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy.  Additionally, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may arrest without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act any fugitive from justice who has escaped or who is using the highways of the state in an attempt to flee.  With the approval of the commissioner or his designee, officers of the Highway Safety Patrol may assist other law enforcement agencies in manhunts for convicted felons who have escaped and/or for alleged felons where there is probable cause to believe that the person being sought committed the felony and a felony had actually been committed. (h)  To cooperate with the State Forest Service by reporting all forest fires. (i)  Upon request of the sheriff or his designee, or board of supervisors of any county or the chief of police or mayor of any municipality, and when so instructed by the commissioner or his designee, to respond to calls for assistance in a law enforcement incident; such request and action shall be noted and clearly reflected on the radio logs of both the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol district substation and that of the requesting agency, entered on the local NCIC terminal, if available, and a request in writing shall follow within forty-eight (48) hours.  Additionally, the time of commencement and termination of the specific law enforcement incident shall be clearly noted on the radio logs of both law enforcement agencies. (2)  The Legislature declares that the primary law enforcement officer in any county in the State of Mississippi is the duly qualified and elected sheriff thereof, but for the purposes of this subsection there is hereby vested in the Department of Public Safety, in addition to the powers hereinabove mentioned and the other provisions of this section under the terms and limitations hereinafter mentioned and for the purpose of insuring domestic tranquility and for the purpose of preventing or suppressing, or both, crimes of violence, acts and conduct calculated to, or which may, provoke or lead to violence and/or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, a breach of the peace, and acts of intimidation or terror, the powers and duties to include the enforcement of all the laws of the State of Mississippi relating to such purposes, to investigate any violation of the laws of the State of Mississippi and to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with violating the laws of the State of Mississippi which relate to such purposes.  Investigators of the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety shall have general police powers to enforce all the laws of the State of Mississippi.  All officers of the Department of Public Safety charged with the enforcement of the laws administered by that agency, for the purposes herein set forth, shall have full power to investigate, prevent, apprehend and arrest law violators anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of general police officers in the performance of their duties.  The officers of the Department of Public Safety are authorized and empowered to carry and use firearms and other weapons deemed necessary in the discharge of their duties as such and are also empowered to serve warrants and subpoenas issued under the authority of the State of Mississippi.  The Governor shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to persons aiding in the investigation, apprehension and conviction of persons charged with acts of violence, or threats of violence or intimidation or acts of terrorism.  The additional powers herein granted to or vested in the Department of Public Safety or any of its officers or employees by this section, excepting investigating powers, and those powers of investigators who shall have general police power, being the investigators in the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, shall not be exercised by the Department of Public Safety, or any of its officers or employees, except upon authority and direction of the Governor or Acting Governor, by proclamation duly signed, in the following instances, to wit: (a)  When requested by the sheriff or board of supervisors of any county or the mayor of any municipality on the grounds that mob violence, crimes of violence, acts and conduct of terrorism, riots or acts of intimidation, or either, calculated to or which may provoke violence or incite riots, mobs, mob violence, violence, or lead to any breach of the peace, or either, and acts of intimidation or terror are anticipated, and when such acts or conduct in the opinion of the Governor or Acting Governor would provoke violence or any of the foregoing acts or conduct set out in this subsection, and the sheriff or mayor, as the case may be, lacks adequate police force to prevent or suppress the same. (b)  Acting upon evidence submitted to him by the Department of Public Safety, or other investigating agency authorized by the Governor or Acting Governor to make such investigations, because of the failure or refusal of the sheriff of any county or mayor of any municipality to take action or employ such means at his disposal, to prevent or suppress the acts, conduct or offenses provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Governor or Acting Governor deems it necessary to invoke the powers and authority vested in the Department of Public Safety. (c)  The Governor or Acting Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to issue his proclamation invoking the powers and authority vested by this paragraph, as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, and when the Governor or Acting Governor issues said proclamation in accordance herewith, said proclamation shall become effective upon the signing thereof and shall continue in full force and effect for a period of ninety (90) days, or for a shorter period if otherwise ordered by the Governor or Acting Governor.  At the signing of the proclamation by the Governor or Acting Governor, the Department of Public Safety and its officers and employees shall thereupon be authorized to exercise the additional power and authority vested in them by this paragraph.  The Governor and Acting Governor may issue additional proclamations for periods of ninety (90) days each under the authority of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2). (3)  All proclamations issued by the Governor or Acting Governor shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State on the next succeeding business day. (4)  It is not the intention of this section to vest the wide powers and authority herein provided for, as general powers of the Department of Public Safety, and the same are not hereby so vested, but to limit these general powers to cases and incidents wherein it is deemed necessary to prevent or suppress the offenses and conditions herein mentioned in this and other subsections of this section, and under the terms and conditions hereinabove enumerated, it being the sense of the Legislature that the prime duties of the Department of Public Safety are to patrol the highways of this state and enforce the highway safety laws. (5)  Patrol officers shall have no interest in any costs in the prosecution of any case through any court; nor shall any patrol officer receive any fee as a witness in any court held in this state, whether a state or federal court. (6)  Provided, however, that the general police power vested by virtue of the terms of subsection (2) of this section is solely for the purposes set out in said subsection. SECTION 49.  Section 45-27-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-27-9.  (1)  All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center an arrest card that will transmit fingerprints, descriptions, photographs (when specifically requested), and other identifying data on persons who have been lawfully arrested or taken into custody in this state for all felonies and misdemeanors as described in Section 45-27-7(2)(a).  It shall be the duty of all chiefs of police, sheriffs, district attorneys, courts, court clerks, judges, parole and probation officers, wardens or other persons in charge of correctional institutions in this state to furnish the center with all data required by the rules duly promulgated under the Administrative Procedures Act to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, and the duty of courts and court clerks to submit a disposition form for every disposition.  It shall be the duty of all criminal justice agencies within the state to supply the prosecutor and the proper court with the disposition form that is attached to the physical arrest card if fingerprints were taken manually or, if fingerprints were captured digitally, the disposition form generated by the electronic fingerprint device at the time of the arrest.  The PEER committee may conduct random review of the records of any agency or clerks referenced in this subsection (1) to determine whether the duties of such agencies and clerks are being fulfilled in a timely manner.  The PEER committee, based on its findings, if any, shall recommend measures to ensure that the duties are more effectively carried out in a timely manner. (2)  (a)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall obtain, or cause to be obtained, fingerprints according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, full face and profile photographs (if equipment is available) and other available identifying data, of each person arrested or taken into custody for an offense of a type designated in subsection (1) of this section, of all persons arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice and of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions, but photographs need not be taken if it is known that photographs of the type listed, taken within the previous year, are on file. Any record taken in connection with any person arrested or taken into custody and subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense through court proceedings shall be purged from the files of the center and destroyed upon receipt by the center of a lawful expunction order.  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrests or takings into custody which result in release without charge or subsequent exoneration from criminal liability within twenty-four (24) hours of the release or exoneration. (b)  The center will work to secure grant funds to purchase live scan equipment to be utilized throughout the state.  All law enforcement agencies shall utilize any live scan equipment provided by the center to ensure the most accurate collection of fingerprints.  The center shall coordinate the use of the equipment with federal, state, county and municipal law enforcement agencies. (3)  Fingerprints and other identifying data required to be taken under subsection (2) shall be forwarded within twenty-four (24) hours after taking for filing and classification, but the period of twenty-four (24) hours may be extended to cover any intervening holiday or weekend.  Photographs taken shall be forwarded at the discretion of the agency concerned, but, if not forwarded, the fingerprint record shall be marked "Photo Available" and the photographs shall be forwarded subsequently if the center so requests. (4)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrest warrants and related identifying data immediately upon determination of the fact that the warrant cannot be served for the reasons stated.  If the warrant is subsequently served or withdrawn, the law enforcement agency concerned must immediately notify the center of the service or withdrawal.  Also, the agency concerned must annually, no later than January 31 of each year and at other times if requested by the center, confirm all arrest warrants which continue to be outstanding.  Upon receipt of a lawful expunction order, the center shall purge and destroy files of all data relating to an offense when an individual is subsequently exonerated from criminal liability of that offense. The center shall not be liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge any records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (5)  All persons in charge of state correctional institutions shall obtain fingerprints, according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise directed by the center, and full face and profile photographs of all persons received on commitment to the institutions.  The prints so taken shall be forwarded to the center, together with any other identifying data requested, within ten (10) days after the arrival at the institution of the person committed.  At the time of release, the institution will again obtain fingerprints, as before, and forward them to the center within ten (10) days, along with any other related information requested by the center.  The institution shall notify the center immediately upon the release of the person. (6)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies, all court clerks, all municipal justices where they have no clerks, all justice court judges and all persons in charge of state and county probation and parole offices, shall supply the center with the information described in subsections (4) and (10) of this section on the basis of the forms and instructions for the disposition form to be supplied by the center. (7)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies in this state shall furnish the center with any other identifying data required in accordance with guidelines established by the center.  All law enforcement agencies and correctional institutions in this state having criminal identification files shall cooperate in providing the center with copies of the items in the files which will aid in establishing the nucleus of the state criminal identification file. (8)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall report to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, all persons wanted by and all vehicles and identifiable property stolen from their jurisdictions.  The report shall be made as soon as is practical after the investigating department or agency either ascertains that a vehicle or identifiable property has been stolen or obtains a warrant for an individual's arrest or determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the individual has committed a crime.  All warrants shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  The report shall be made within a reasonable time period following the reporting department's or agency's determination that it has grounds to believe that a vehicle or property was stolen or that the wanted person should be arrested. (9)  All law enforcement agencies in the state shall immediately notify the center if at any time after making a report as required by subsection (8) of this section it is determined by the reporting department or agency that a person is no longer wanted or that a vehicle or property stolen has been recovered.  Furthermore, if the agency making the apprehension or recovery is not the one which made the original report, then it shall immediately notify the originating agency of the full particulars relating to the apprehension or recovery using methods prescribed by the center. (10)  All law enforcement agencies in the state and clerks of the various courts shall promptly report to the center all instances where records of convictions of criminals are ordered expunged by courts of this state as now provided by law.  The center shall promptly expunge from the files of the center and destroy all records pertaining to any convictions that are ordered expunged by the courts of this state as provided by law. (11)  The center shall not be held liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (12)  Any criminal justice department or agency making an expenditure in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year on software or programming upgrades concerning a computerized records management system or jail management system shall ensure that the new or upgraded system is formatted to Department of Justice approved XML format and that no impediments to data sharing with other agencies or departments exist in the software programming. (13)  (a)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall: (i)  Implement an incident-based reporting system within the agency or department that meets the reporting requirements of the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation; (ii)  Use the system described by subparagraph (i) to submit to the center information and statistics concerning criminal offenses committed in the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency, in a manner prescribed by the center; and (iii)  Report the information as soon as is practicable after the investigating agency or department ascertains that a qualifying crime has been committed in its jurisdiction, once the state-level NIBRS Repository is available. (b)  No later than December 31, 2025, state and local law enforcement agencies shall be compliant with all regulations promulgated by the Department of Public Safety's Criminal Information Center (CIC), with consultation with the President of the Sheriffs Association and Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police with regard to the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. SECTION 50.  Section 45-33-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-33.  (1)  (a)  The failure of an offender to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, or to provide any registration or other information, including, but not limited to, initial registration, reregistration, change of address information, change of employment, change of name, required notification to a volunteer organization or any other registration duty or submission of information required by this chapter is a violation of this chapter.  Additionally, forgery of information or submission of information under false pretenses, whether by the registrant or another person, is also a violation of this chapter. (b)  A person commits a violation of this chapter who: (i)  Knowingly harbors, or knowingly attempts to harbor, or knowingly assists another person in harboring or attempting to harbor a sex offender who is in violation of this chapter; (ii)  Knowingly assists a sex offender in eluding a law enforcement agency that is seeking to find the sex offender to question the sex offender about, or to arrest the sex offender for, noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter; or (iii)  Provides information to a law enforcement agency regarding a sex offender which the person knows to be false. (c)  A registrant who is required to submit to electronic monitoring who does not comply with all the terms and conditions of the electronic monitoring commits a violation of this chapter. (2)  (a)  Unless otherwise specified, a violation of this chapter shall be considered a felony and shall be punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than five (5) years, or both fine and imprisonment. (b)  A person who is required to register under this chapter who is subsequently convicted for a registration violation under this section, upon release from incarceration, shall submit to mandatory electronic monitoring under the program established under Section 45-33-45 for a period computed by subtracting the time the person spent in actual incarceration from the five-year maximum imprisonment for the offense and the period of post-release monitoring shall not be suspended or reduced by the court or the Department of Corrections. (3)  Whenever it appears that an offender has failed to comply with the duty to register, reregister or submit to electronic monitoring, the department shall promptly notify the sheriff of the county of the last-known address of the offender as well as the sheriff of the county of the last-known location of the offender, if different.  Upon notification, the sheriff shall attempt to locate the offender at his last-known address or last-known location. (a)  If the sheriff locates the offender, he shall enforce the provisions of this chapter, including initiation of prosecution if appropriate.  The sheriff shall then notify the department with the current information regarding the offender. (b)  If the sheriff is unable to locate the offender, the sheriff shall promptly notify the department and initiate a criminal prosecution against the offender for the failure to register, reregister or comply with electronic monitoring.  The sheriff shall make the appropriate transactions into the Federal Bureau of Investigation's wanted-person database and issue a warrant for the offender's arrest.  The warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  The department shall notify the United States Marshals Service of the offender's noncompliant status and shall update the registry database and website to show the defendant's noncompliant status as an absconder. (4)  A violation of this chapter shall result in the arrest of the offender. (5)  Any prosecution for a violation of this section shall be brought by a prosecutor in the county of the violation. (6)  A person required to register under this chapter who commits any act or omission in violation of this chapter may be prosecuted for the act or omission in the county in which the act or omission was committed, the county of the last registered address of the sex offender, the county in which the conviction occurred for the offense or offenses that meet the criteria requiring the person to register, the county in which he was designated a sex offender, or the county in which the sex offender was found. (7)  The Commissioner of Public Safety or his authorized agent shall suspend the driver's license or driving privilege of any offender failing to comply with the duty to report, register or reregister, submit to monitoring, or who has provided false information. (8)  When a person required to register under this chapter is accused of any registration offense under this section, pretrial release on bond shall be conditioned on the offender's submission to electronic monitoring under the program established under Section 45-33-45. SECTION 51.  Section 45-33-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-63.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful for a person required to register as a sex offender under Section 45-33-25 to do or commit any of the following actions with respect to the victim of the offense triggering the duty to register under this chapter: (a)  Threaten, visit, assault, molest, abuse, injure, or otherwise interfere with the victim; (b)  Follow the victim, including at the victim's workplace; (c)  Harass the victim; (d)  Contact the victim by telephone, written communication, or electronic means; (e)  Enter or remain present at the victim's residence, school, or place of employment when the victim is present. (2)  This section does not apply if the court in which the conviction was had, at the request of the victim or the parent, guardian or conservator of the victim, enters an order allowing contact with the victim.  The court may enter such an order if the court determines that reasonable grounds for the victim to fear any future contact with the defendant no longer exist. (3)  A violation of this section is a felony punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than five (5) nor more than ten (10) years. (4)  A law enforcement officer shall arrest and take into custody a person, with or without a warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or other process, if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person knowingly has violated this section. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the issuance or enforcement of a criminal sexual assault protection against a defendant who has been convicted under Section 97-3-65 or 97-3-95. (6)  This section shall be known as Carly's Law. SECTION 52.  Section 47-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-27.  (1)  The board may, at any time and upon a showing of probable violation of parole, issue a warrant for the return of any paroled offender to the custody of the department.  The warrant shall authorize all persons named therein to return the paroled offender to actual custody of the department from which he was paroled. (2)  Any field supervisor may arrest an offender without a warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act or may deputize any other person with power of arrest by giving him a written statement setting forth that the offender has, in the judgment of that field supervisor, violated the conditions of his parole or earned-release supervision.  The written statement delivered with the offender by the arresting officer to the official in charge of the department facility from which the offender was released or other place of detention designated by the department shall be sufficient warrant for the detention of the offender. (3)  The field supervisor, after making an arrest, shall present to the detaining authorities a similar statement of the circumstances of violation.  The field supervisor shall at once notify the board or department of the arrest and detention of the offender and shall submit a written report showing in what manner the offender has violated the conditions of parole or earned-release supervision.  An offender for whose return a warrant has been issued by the board shall, after the issuance of the warrant, be deemed a fugitive from justice. (4)  Whenever an offender is arrested on a warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act for an alleged violation of parole as herein provided, the board shall hold an informal preliminary hearing within seventy-two (72) hours to determine whether there is reasonable cause to believe the person has violated a condition of parole.  A preliminary hearing shall not be required when the offender is not under arrest on a warrant or the offender signed a waiver of a preliminary hearing. The preliminary hearing may be conducted electronically. (5)  The right of the State of Mississippi to extradite persons and return fugitives from justice, from other states to this state, shall not be impaired by this chapter and shall remain in full force and effect.  An offender convicted of a felony committed while on parole, whether in the State of Mississippi or another state, shall immediately have his parole revoked upon presentment of a certified copy of the commitment order to the board.  If an offender is on parole and the offender is convicted of a felony for a crime committed prior to the offender being placed on parole, whether in the State of Mississippi or another state, the offender may have his parole revoked upon presentment of a certified copy of the commitment order to the board. (6)  (a)  The board shall hold a hearing for any parolee who is detained as a result of a warrant or a violation report within twenty-one (21) days of the parolee's admission to detention.  The board may, in its discretion, terminate the parole or modify the terms and conditions thereof.  If the board revokes parole for one or more technical violations the board shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center operated by the department not to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days for the second revocation.  For the third revocation, the board may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center for up to one hundred * * *and eighty (180) days or the board may impose the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence.  For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose up to the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The period of imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under this section shall not be reduced in any manner. (b)  If the board does not hold a hearing or does not take action on the violation within the twenty-one-day time frame in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the parolee shall be released from detention and shall return to parole status.  The board may subsequently hold a hearing and may revoke parole or may continue parole and modify the terms and conditions of parole.  If the board revokes parole for one or more technical violations the board shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center operated by the department not to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days for the second revocation.  For the third revocation, the board may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center for up to one hundred eighty (180) days or the board may impose the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence.  For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose up to the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence.  The period of imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under this section shall not be reduced in any manner. (c)  For a parolee charged with one or more technical violations who has not been detained awaiting the revocation hearing, the board may hold a hearing within a reasonable time.  The board may revoke parole or may continue parole and modify the terms and conditions of parole.  If the board revokes parole for one or more technical violations the board shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center operated by the department not to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days for the second revocation.  For the third revocation, the board may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center for up to one hundred eighty (180) days or the board may impose the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence.  For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose up to the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence.  The period of imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under this section shall not be reduced in any manner. (7)  Unless good cause for the delay is established in the record of the proceeding, the parole revocation charge shall be dismissed if the revocation hearing is not held within the thirty (30) days of the issuance of the warrant. (8)  The chairman and each member of the board and the designated parole revocation hearing officer may, in the discharge of their duties, administer oaths, summon and examine witnesses, and take other steps as may be necessary to ascertain the truth of any matter about which they have the right to inquire. (9)  The board shall provide semiannually to the Oversight Task Force the number of warrants issued for an alleged violation of parole, the average time between detention on a warrant and preliminary hearing, the average time between detention on a warrant and revocation hearing, the number of ninety-day sentences in a technical violation center issued by the board, the number of one-hundred-twenty-day sentences in a technical violation center issued by the board, the number of one-hundred-eighty-day sentences issued by the board, and the number and average length of the suspended sentences imposed by the board in response to a violation. SECTION 53.  Section 49-5-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-5-47.  In case of a violation of this chapter or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, fish by a corporation the warrant of arrest may be read to and a true copy delivered to the president, secretary, or manager in this state, or to any general or local agent thereof in the county in compliance with Section 1 of this act where the action is pending, and, upon the return of such warrant so served, the corporation shall be deemed in court and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, and any fines imposed may be collected by the execution against the property of such corporation, but this section shall not be deemed to exempt any agent or employee from prosecution. SECTION 54.  Section 49-5-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-5-115.  (a)  Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 49-5-107, or any regulations issued under Section 49-5-107 or whoever fails to procure or violates the terms of any permit issued thereunder shall be guilty of a Class I violation and punished as provided in Section 49-7-141. (b)  Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 49-5-109, or any regulations issued pursuant thereto or whoever fails to procure or violates the terms of any permit issued under subsections (d) and (e) of Section 49-5-111 is guilty of a Class I violation and is punishable as provided under Section 49-7-141. (c)  All law enforcement and management officers of the commission and other law enforcement officers authorized to enforce the laws of the State of Mississippi are authorized to carry out the provisions of Sections 49-5-101 through 49-5-119.  Any officer or agent may, without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, arrest any person who the officer or agent has probable cause to believe is violating, in his presence or view, any section, regulation or permit provided for by Sections 49-5-101 through 49-5-119.  An officer or agent who has made an arrest of a person for any such violation may search the person or business records at the time of arrest and seize any wildlife, records, or property taken, or used in connection with the violation. (d)  Equipment, merchandise, wildlife, or records seized under subsection (c) of this section shall be held by an officer or agent of the commission pending disposition of court proceedings, and may be forfeited to the state for destruction or disposition as the commission may deem appropriate.  Prior to forfeiture, the commission may direct the transfer of wildlife so seized to a qualified zoological, educational, or scientific institution for safekeeping, costs thereof to be assessable to the defendant.  The commission is authorized to issue regulations to implement this subsection. SECTION 55.  Section 49-15-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-15-45.  Any municipality bounded by the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound, which has wholly or partly within its corporate limits, or in the waters adjacent thereto, a public oyster reef reserved for catching oysters exclusively by use of hand tongs, is hereby authorized to aid and cooperate with the department in enforcing all laws regulating the catching, taking and transporting of oysters, including all of the provisions of this chapter in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and all regulations and ordinances of such department relating to such oyster reefs. SECTION 56.  Section 51-9-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-9-175.  (1)  The board of directors of the district may appoint and commission qualified persons as reservoir police officers of the district.  Any such reservoir police officer so appointed shall be certified by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training or in accordance with the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training and shall attain certification or recertification within one (1) year of appointment, and shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the board of directors of the district. (2)  A reservoir police officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his commission.  The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be entered in the official minute book of the district. (3)  A reservoir police officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of this article, shall, while engaged in the performance of his duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him as a reservoir police officer of the district and an identification card issued by the district.  When in uniform, each such reservoir police officer shall wear his badge in plain view. (4)  A reservoir police officer may exercise the same powers of arrest in compliance with Section 1 of this act and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to violations of law or violations of regulations adopted pursuant to Section 51-9-127, which are committed on the property owned by the district.  This includes property which is owned by the district but has been leased or rented to other parties.  Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state. (5)  On behalf of each person who is trained as a reservoir police officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy, the district shall be required to pay to the academy at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of the academy as tuition. SECTION 57.  Section 59-21-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-21-127.  It shall be the duty of all enforcement officers to enforce, and to obey and carry out all instructions, directions, rules and regulations of the commission with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.  Each enforcement officer shall account for and pay over, pursuant to law, all monies received by him or her under this chapter. Such enforcement officers shall have the power, and it shall be their duty, to execute all warrants in compliance with Section 1 of this act for violations of the rules and regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter; to serve subpoenas issued for the examination and investigation or trial of such violations; to board and examine, without warrant, any vessel required to be numbered under this chapter, to ascertain whether any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission has been or is being violated, and to use such force as may be necessary for the purpose of such examination and inspection; to arrest, without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, any person committing a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission in the presence of the enforcement officers, and to take such person before a magistrate or court having jurisdiction for trial or hearing; and to exercise such other powers of peace officers in the enforcement of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission or of a judgment for the violation thereof, as are not herein specifically provided.  No enforcement officers shall compromise or settle out of court any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission. SECTION 58.  Section 63-9-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-9-23.  The foregoing provisions of this chapter shall govern all police officers in making arrests without a warrant for violations of Chapters 3, 5 and 7 of this title for offenses committed in their presence, but the procedure prescribed herein shall not otherwise be exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense of like grade.  All arrests shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 59.  Section 63-17-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-17-5.  Any owner or person having an automobile in his or her possession shall, upon request of any sheriff, constable, justice of the peace, mayor, marshal or police officer, exhibit to such officer for inspection the bill of sale provided for in Section 63-17-1, or shall permit such officer to make inspection of such automobile, and shall answer all inquiries truthfully that may be propounded by such officer with references to such automobile and the history of the title thereto.  Refusal so to do shall subject such person to immediate arrest by such officer, without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and subject him or her to the penalties prescribed by law. SECTION 60.  Section 65-1-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-1-131.  (1)  The Mississippi Transportation Commission may appoint and commission qualified persons as security officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation. Any such security officer so appointed shall be a full-time employee of the Transportation Department and shall not be employed by any privately owned guard or security service, and shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation. (2)  A security officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his commission.  The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be entered in the official minute book of the Transportation Commission. (3)  A security officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall, while engaged in the performance of his duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him as a security officer of the Mississippi Department of Transportation and an identification card issued by the Transportation Commission.  When in uniform, each such security officer shall wear his badge in plain view. (4)  A security officer appointed and commissioned under subsection (1) of this section may exercise the same powers of arrest in compliance with Section 1 of this act and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to violations of law which are committed on or within buildings, property or facilities owned by or under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Commission or the Transportation Department.  Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state. (5)  On behalf of each person who is employed as a security officer under subsection (1) of this section and who is trained as a security officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy, the Transportation Department shall be required to pay to the academy at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of said academy as tuition. SECTION 61.  Section 67-1-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-31.  The department shall issue to all agents and inspectors appointed under this article a written certificate of appointment under the seal of said department, of which judicial notice shall be taken by all courts of this state.  Such agents and inspectors are hereby declared to be police officers in enforcing the provisions of this article, and in the performance of their duties such employees shall have the authority to bear arms, to make arrests, in compliance with Section 1 of this act to make searches and seizures under this article and in compliance with Section 1 of this act, and to serve any protest, notice or order connected with the enforcement of this article by whatever officer or authority of court issued.  The members of the department shall not be personally liable to any person on account of any act, neglect or omission of any such agent or inspector. The powers and duties of the agents and inspectors shall include, in addition to all others prescribed by law the following powers:  to arrest, without warrant, any person committing or attempting to commit a misdemeanor, felony or a breach of the peace within his presence or view, and to pursue and so arrest any person committing such an offense to and at any place in the state where the person may go or be; and to aid and assist any law enforcement officer, if requested. SECTION 62.  Section 77-7-335, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-7-335.  (1)  All division inspectors on duty shall wear uniforms, shall have the right to bear arms, and shall have the authority to make arrests and hold and impound any vehicle and the contents thereof which is being operated in violation of this chapter or the commission's or the department's rules, regulations or general orders promulgated thereunder. (2)  All inspectors shall have the authority to enforce all of the laws, rules and regulations of the commission and the department under this chapter upon all highways in the state and the rights-of-way of such highways and other properties as defined in Section 77-7-261; except that if any person commits an offense in violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission or the department upon a highway in the state and be pursued by an enforcement officer or inspector of the division, such enforcement officer or inspector may pursue and apprehend such offender upon any of the highways in this state, or to any other place to which such offender may flee. (3)  All inspectors shall have the authority to aid and assist any law enforcement officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy and may arrest without warrant in compliance with Section 1 of this act any fugitive from justice who has escaped or who is using the highways in the state in an attempt to flee.  Inspectors of the division may assist other law enforcement agencies in searching for convicted felons who have escaped or for alleged felons where there is probable cause to believe that the person being sought committed the felony and a felony had actually been committed. (4)  Upon request of a sheriff of any county or the chief of police of any community, all division inspectors have the authority to assist in traffic control during time of natural disasters, such as hurricanes, tornados or floods. (5) All inspectors shall have the authority to assist any officer of the department at the discretion and direction of the commissioner. (6)  All inspectors shall have the authority to purchase and use speed detection equipment on commercial vehicles that they are authorized to inspect as provided in Section 77-7-16. SECTION 63.  Section 77-9-505, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-9-505.  (1)  Upon request by the chief police officer of any railroad located wholly or partially within this state, the Commissioner of Public Safety may appoint and commission as a railroad police officer any qualified person named by such chief police officer; provided, however, that the Commissioner of Public Safety may refuse to appoint or may rescind the appointment of anyone.  Any such railroad police officer so appointed shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the Commissioner of Public Safety. (2)  A railroad police officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his or her duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his or her commission.  The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be recorded in the office of the Commissioner of Public Safety. (3)  A railroad police officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall, while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him or her as a police officer of the railroad and an identification card issued by the railroad and countersigned by the Commissioner of Public Safety.  When in uniform each such railroad police officer shall wear his or her badge in plain view. (4)  A railroad policeman may exercise the same powers of arrest and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to offenses committed against property owned by or in the possession of the railroad or against any person arising out of an offense committed against said railroad on railroad property, or against any employee of the railroad engaged in the performance of his or her duties. Railroad property for the purposes of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517 shall be construed to mean only property owned by or in possession of the railroad on railroad rights-of-way or switching yards.  Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state and in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (5)  Any person who is trained as a railroad police officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Training Academy shall be required to pay at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of said academy as tuition. SECTION 64.  Section 93-9-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-31.  (1)  The court shall, if need be, require the father to give security by bond or other security, with sufficient sureties approved by the court, for the payment of the order of filiation.  Such security, when required, shall not exceed three (3) times the total periodic sum the father shall be required to pay under the terms of the order of filiation in any one (1) calendar year.  If bond or security be required, and in case the action has been instituted by a public welfare official, the defendant shall also be required to give security that he will indemnify the state and the county where the child was or may be born and every other county against any expense for the support and education of the child, which said undertaking shall also require that all arrears shall be paid by the principal and sureties.  In default of such security, when required, the court may commit him to jail, or put him on probation.  At any time within one (1) year he may be discharged from jail, but his liability to pay the judgment shall not be thereby affected. (2)  Whenever any order of filiation has been made, but no bond or other security has been required for payment of support of the child, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, the court may, upon petition of the person to whom such payments are due, or such person's legal representative, enter an order requiring that bond or other security be given by the father in accordance with and under such terms and conditions as provided for in subsection (1) of this section.  The father shall, as in other civil actions, be served with process and shall be entitled to a hearing in such case. (3)  Where security is given and default is made in any payment, the court shall cite the parties bound by the security requiring them to show cause why judgment should not be given against them and execution issued thereon.  If the amount due and unpaid shall not be paid before the return day of the citation, and no cause be shown to the contrary, judgment shall be rendered against those served with the citation for the amount due and unpaid together with costs, and execution shall issue therefor, saving all remedies upon the bond for future default.  The judgment is a lien on real estate and in other respects enforceable the same as other judgments.  The amount collected on such judgment or such sums as may have been deposited as collateral, in lieu of bond when forfeited, may be used for the benefit of the child, as provided for in the order of filiation. (4)  If at any time after an order of filiation in paternity proceedings shall have been made, and an undertaking given thereon, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49 and such undertaking shall not be complied with, or that for any reason a recovery thereon cannot be had, or if the original undertaking shall have been complied with, and the sureties discharged therefrom, or if money were deposited in lieu of bail, and the same shall have been exhausted, and the natural child still needs support, the public welfare official of any county where the natural child for whose support the order of filiation was made shall be at the time, or the Commissioner of the State Welfare Department upon giving proof of the making of the order of filiation, the giving of the above-mentioned undertaking, and the noncompliance therewith, or that the sureties have been discharged from their liability, or that for any reason a recovery cannot be had on such undertaking, may apply to the court in such county having jurisdiction in filiation proceedings, for a warrant for the arrest of the defendant against whom such order of filiation was made in compliance with Section 1 of this act, which shall be executed in the manner provided in criminal procedure for the execution of the warrant; upon the arrest and arraignment of the defendant in said court, and upon proof of the making of the order of filiation, the giving of the above-mentioned undertaking, and the noncompliance therewith, or that for any reason a recovery cannot be had on such undertaking, the said court shall make an order requiring him to give a new undertaking, which said undertaking shall also require that all arrears shall be paid by the principal and sureties, or upon his failure to give such new undertaking, shall commit him to jail, or put him on probation. (5)  If the child and mother die, or the father and mother be legally married to each other, the court in which such security is filed, on proof of such fact, may cause the security to be marked "cancelled" and be surrendered to the obligors. SECTION 65.  Section 97-19-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-19-75.  (1)  The holder of any check, draft or order for the payment of money which has been made, drawn, issued, uttered or delivered in violation of Section 97-19-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, may, after complying with the provisions of Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, present a complaint to the district attorney.  The complaint shall be accompanied by the original check, draft or order upon which the complaint is filed and the return receipt showing mailing of notice under Section 97-19-57, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Not more than one (1) check, draft or order shall be included within a single complaint.  Upon receipt of such complaint, the district attorney shall evaluate the complaint to determine whether or not the complaint is appropriate to be processed by the district attorney. (2)  If, after filing a complaint with the district attorney, the complainant wishes to withdraw the complaint for good cause, the complainant shall pay a fee of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) to the office of the district attorney for processing such complaint. Upon payment of the processing fee and withdrawal of the complaint, the district attorney shall return the original check, draft or order to the complainant. (3)  After approval of the complaint by the district attorney, a warrant may be issued by any judicial officer authorized by law to issue arrest warrants, the warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act and the warrant may be held by the district attorney.  After issuance of a warrant or upon approval of a complaint by the district attorney, the district attorney shall issue a notice to the individual charged in the complaint, informing him that a warrant has been issued for his arrest or that a complaint has been received by the district attorney and that he may be eligible for deferred prosecution for a violation of Section 97-19-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, by voluntarily surrendering himself to the district attorney within ten (10) days, Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays excepted, from receipt of the notice.  Such notice shall be sent by United States mail. (4)  (a)  If the check is not a casino marker, and the accused voluntarily surrenders himself within the time period as provided by subsection (3) of this section, the accused shall be presented with the complaint and/or warrant and prosecution of the accused may be deferred upon payment by the accused of a service charge in the amount of Forty Dollars ($40.00) to the district attorney and by execution of a restitution agreement as hereinafter provided. (b)  If the check is a casino marker, and the accused voluntarily surrenders himself within the time period as provided by subsection (3) of this section, the accused shall be presented with the complaint and/or warrant, and prosecution of the accused may be deferred upon payment by the accused of a service charge in the amounts specified in this paragraph (b) to the district attorney and by execution of a restitution agreement as hereinafter provided.  The amounts of the service charge are as follows: (i)  Forty Dollars ($40.00), if the amount of the check or draft is equal to or less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (ii)  Fifty Dollars ($50.00), if the face amount of the check or draft is more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) but does not exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00). (iii)  Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00), if the face amount of the check or draft is more than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) but does not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (iv)  One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00), if the face amount of the check or draft is more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) but does not exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). (v)  Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), if the face amount of the check or draft is more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) but does not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). (vi)  Ten percent (10%) of the face amount of the check or draft, if the face amount of the check or draft is more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). (5)  For the purposes of Sections 97-19-73 through 97-19-81, the term "restitution" shall mean and be defined as the face amount of any check, draft or order for the payment of money made, drawn, issued, uttered or delivered in violation of Section 97-19-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, plus a service charge payable to the complainant in the amount of Thirty Dollars ($30.00). (6)  After an accused has voluntarily surrendered himself and paid the service charge as provided by subsection (4) of this section, the district attorney may enter into a restitution agreement with the accused prescribing the terms by which the accused shall satisfy restitution to the district attorney on behalf of the complainant.  The terms of such agreement shall be determined on a case-by-case basis by the district attorney, but the duration of any such agreement shall be no longer than a period of six (6) months.  No interest shall be charged or collected on restitution monies.  The restitution agreement shall be signed by the accused and approved by the district attorney before it is effective.  If the accused does not honor each term of the restitution agreement signed by him, the accused may be proceeded against by prosecution under the provisions of Sections 97-19-55 through 97-19-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, and as provided by Section 97-19-79.  If the accused makes restitution and pays all charges set out by statute or if the accused enters into a restitution agreement as set out above and honors all terms of such agreement, then if requested, the original check may be returned to the accused and a photocopy retained in the check file. (7)  If the holder of any check, draft or order for the payment of money presents to the district attorney satisfactory evidence that the original check, draft or order is unavailable and satisfactory evidence of the check, draft or order is presented in the form of bank records or a photographic copy of the instrument, whether from microfilm or otherwise, then the procedures provided for in this section may be followed in the absence of the original check, draft or order. SECTION 66.  Section 97-19-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-19-79.  If, after receiving notice as provided for by subsection (3) of Section 97-19-75, the accused fails to timely surrender himself to the district attorney as prescribed in the notice or, if having timely surrendered himself, the accused fails to pay the service charge prescribed by subsection (4) of Section 97-19-75 and/or fails to execute or comply with the terms of any restitution agreement executed in accordance with the provisions of Section 97-19-75, then the district attorney shall file the complaint, along with the arrest warrant, if any, which the district attorney may be holding against the accused, with the municipal court, justice court, county court or circuit court in his district having jurisdiction, and prosecution against the accused may be commenced in accordance with the provisions of Sections 97-19-55 through 97-19-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, or as otherwise provided by law.  The arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  If such prosecution is commenced, the court may assess the defendant the service charge payable to the district attorney as provided in Section 97-19-75(4), Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 67.  Section 99-3-18, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-18.  (1)  In any case in which a person is arrested for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor and does not demand to be taken before a municipal judge, justice court judge or other judge, such person may, instead of being taken before a judge, be released according to the procedures set forth by this section and Section 99-3-17. If the arresting officer or his superior determines that the person should be released, such officer or superior shall prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear in court, containing the name and address of such person, the offense charged, and the time when and place where such person shall appear in court. If the person is not released prior to being booked and the officer in charge of the booking or his superior determines that the person should be released, such officer or superior shall prepare such written notice to appear in court. Unless waived by the arrested person, the time specified in the notice to appear shall be at least five (5) days after arrest.  The place specified in the notice shall be the court of the municipal judge, justice court judge or other judge before whom the person would be taken if the requirement of taking an arrested person before a judge were complied with, or shall be an officer authorized by such court to receive a deposit of bail. (2)  The officer shall deliver one (1) copy of the notice to appear to the arrested person, and the arrested person, in order to secure release, shall give his written promise to appear in court by signing the duplicate notice which shall be retained by the officer.  Thereupon the arresting officer shall forthwith release the person arrested from custody.  The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file the duplicate notice with the municipal judge, justice court judge or other judge specified therein.  No warrant shall issue on such charge for the arrest of a person who has given such written promise to appear in court, unless and until he has violated such promise or has failed to appear for trial or judgment, or to comply with the terms and provisions of the judgment, as required by law.  All arrests shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (3)  If the arrested person is not released pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 99-3-17 prior to being booked by the arresting agency, then at the time of booking, the officer in charge of such booking or his superior officer, or any other person designated by a city or county for this purpose may make an immediate investigation into the background of the person to determine whether he should be released pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 99-3-17.  Such investigation shall include, but need not be limited to, the person's name, address, length of residence at that address, length of residence within this state, marital and family status, employment, length of that employment, prior arrest record and such other facts relating to the person's arrest which would bear on the question of his release pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 99-3-17. SECTION 68.  Section 99-3-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-19.  When a person accused of any offense removes or escapes to another county, a warrant issued by a justice of the peace in the county in which the offense was committed shall authorize the arrest of such offender, and his or her removal to the county in which the offense was committed or is triable.  All arrests shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 69.  Section 99-3-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-21.  A justice of the peace of any county into which an offender may have removed himself or herself or escaped, on the oath of some credible person, may issue his or her warrant for the arrest of such offender, returnable before any justice of the peace of the county where the offense is cognizable, which shall authorize the arrest and removal of such offender to the proper county for examination.  The arrest shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 70.  Section 99-3-28, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-28.  (1)  (a)  (i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before an arrest warrant shall be issued against any teacher who is a licensed public school employee as defined in Section 37-9-1, a certified jail officer as defined in Section 45-4-9, a counselor at an adolescent opportunity program created under Section 43-27-201 et seq., or a sworn law enforcement officer within this state as defined in Section 45-6-3 for a criminal act, whether misdemeanor or felony, which is alleged to have occurred while the teacher, jail officer, counselor at an adolescent opportunity program or law enforcement officer was in the performance of official duties, a probable cause hearing shall be held before a circuit court judge.  The purpose of the hearing shall be to determine if adequate probable cause exists for the issuance of a warrant.  All parties testifying in these proceedings shall do so under oath.  The accused shall have the right to enter an appearance at the hearing, represented by legal counsel at his own expense, to hear the accusations and evidence against him; he may present evidence or testify in his own behalf. (ii)  The authority receiving any such charge or complaint against a teacher, jail officer, counselor at an adolescent offender program or law enforcement officer shall immediately present same to the county prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction who shall immediately present the charge or complaint to a circuit judge in the judicial district where the action arose for disposition pursuant to this section. (b)  For any person not covered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, before an arrest warrant based on the criminal complaint of a person who is not a law enforcement officer acting in the officer's official capacity may be issued against the person for an alleged criminal act, whether misdemeanor or felony, the appropriate judge must make a determination, with or without a hearing, as to whether the affidavit clearly identifies probable cause to believe that the offense alleged has been committed, at the discretion of the court.  If the judge elects to hold a probable cause hearing, parties testifying shall do so under oath and the accused shall have the right to enter an appearance, be represented by legal counsel at his own expense, to hear the accusations and evidence against him, and may present evidence or testify in his own behalf. (2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the issuance of an arrest warrant by a circuit court judge upon presentation of probable cause, without the holding of a probable cause hearing, if adequate evidence is presented to satisfy the court that there is a significant risk that the accused will flee the court's jurisdiction or that the accused poses a threat to the safety or well-being of the public.  The arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (3)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit a law enforcement officer from arresting any person under circumstances in which the law enforcement officer would not be required to seek a warrant from a court. SECTION 71.  Section 99-20-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-20-17.  Upon failure to complete the community service sentence, the case shall be restored to the court calendar for resentencing and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant shall immediately be issued.  The arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 72.  Section 99-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-21-1.  Any conservator of the peace, upon complaint on oath made before him or her, or on other satisfactory evidence, that any person within this state has committed treason, felony, or other crime in some other state or territory, and has fled from justice may issue a warrant for the arrest of such person as if the offense had been committed in this state  The arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. SECTION 73.  Section 99-33-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-33-3.  On affidavit of the commission of any crime, of which the justice court has jurisdiction, lodged with the justice court, the clerk shall, upon direction by a justice court judge of the county, issue a warrant for the arrest of the offender returnable forthwith or on a certain day to be named.  The arrest warrant shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act.  The clerk, or the justice court judge to whom the case is assigned, shall issue subpoenas for witnesses as in civil cases, and the justice court judge may enter a conviction as provided in Section 99-19-3, or shall try and dispose of the case according to law; and, on conviction, shall order such punishment to be inflicted as the law provides; provided, however, that no fine imposed shall be in an amount less than Fifteen Dollars ($15.00). SECTION 74.  Section 99-37-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-37-7.  (1)  Subject to the provisions of Section 99-19-20.1, when a defendant sentenced to pay a fine or to make restitution defaults in the payment thereof or of any installment, the court, on motion of the district attorney, or upon its own motion, may require him to show cause why his default should not be treated as contempt of court, and may issue a show cause citation or a warrant of arrest for his appearance.  The warrant of arrest shall be executed in compliance with Section 1 of this act. (2)  Subject to the provisions of Section 99-19-20.1, unless the defendant shows that his default was not attributable to an intentional refusal to obey the order of the court or to a failure on his part to make a good faith effort to make the payment, the court may find that his default constitutes contempt and may order him committed until the fine or the restitution, or a specified part thereof, is paid. (3)  A judicial officer shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for failure of any defendant to pay any fine or to make restitution if the officer exercises his judicial authority in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section to require the payment of such fine or restitution. (4)  When a fine or an order of restitution is imposed on a corporation or unincorporated association, it is the duty of the person authorized to make disbursement from the assets of the corporation or association to pay the fine or make the restitution from those assets, and his failure to do so may be held to be contempt unless he makes the showing required in subsection (2) of this section. SECTION 75.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.